[3501]
Masruq reported: I do not mind if I give option to my wife (to get divorce) once, hundred times, or thousand times after (knowing it) that she has chosen me (and would never seek divorce).I asked 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) (about it) and she said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave us the option, but did it imply divorce? (It was in fact not a divorce; it is effective when women actually avail themselves of it.)
[3502]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave option to his wives, but it was not a divorce.
[3503]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave us the option (to get divorce) and we chose him and he did not count it a divorce.
[3504]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messeinger (may peace be upon him) gave us the option (to get divorce), but me made a choice of him and he did not count anything (as divorce) in regard to us.
[3505]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of 'A'isha through another chain of narrators.
[3506]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) came and sought permission to see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).He found people sitting at his door and none amongst them had been granted permission, but it was granted to Abu Bakr and he went in.Then came 'Umar and he sought permission and it was granted to him, and he found Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sitting sad and silent with his wives around him.He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: I would say something which would make the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) laugh, so he said: Messenger of Allah, I wish you had seen (the treatment meted out to) the daughter ofKhadija when you asked me some money, and I got up and slapped her on her neck.Allah's Messenger (mav peace be upon him) laughed and said: They are around me as you see, asking for extra money.Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) then got up went to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and slapped her on the neck, and 'Umar stood up before Hafsa and slapped her saying: You ask Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which he does not possess.They said: By Allah, we do not ask Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for anything he does not possess.Then he withdrew from them for a month or for twenty-nine days.Then this verse was revealed to him: "Prophet: Say to thy wives . . . for a mighty reward" (xxxiii. 28).He then went first to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and said: I want to propound something to you, 'A'isha, but wish no hasty reply before you consult your parents.She said: Messenger of Allah, what is that?He (the Holy Prophet) recited to her the verse, whereupon she said: Is it about you that I should consult my parents, Messenger of Allah?Nay, I choose Allah, His Messenger, and the Last Abode; but I ask you not to tell any of your wives what I have said He replied: Not one of them will ask me without my informing her.God did not send me to be harsh, or cause harm, but He has sent me to teach and make things easy.
[3507]
'Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) reported: When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) kept himself away from his wives, I entered the mosque, and found people striking the ground with pebblesand saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has divorced his wives, and that was before they were commanded to observe seclusion 'Umar said to himself: I must find this (actual position) today.So I went to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and said (to her): Daughter of Abu Bakr, have you gone to the extent of giving trouble to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)?Thereupon she said: Son of Khattab, you have nothing to do with me, and I have nothing to do with you.You should look to your own receptacle. He ('Umar) said: I visited Hafsa daughter of 'Umar, and said to her: Hafsa, the (news) has reached me that you cause Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) trouble.You know that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) does not love you, and had I not been (your father) he would have divorced you. (On hearing this) she wept bitterly.I said to her: Where is Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)?Shesaid: He is in the attic room.I went in and found Rabah, the servant of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him),sitting on the thresholds of the window dangling his feet on the hollow wood of the date-palm with the help of which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) climbed (to the apartment) and came down.I cried: 0 Rabah, seek permission for me from Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him). Rabah cast a glance at the apartment and then looked toward me but said nothing. I again said: Rabah, seek permission for me from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).Rabah looked towards the apartment and then cast a glance at me, but said nothig. I then raised my voice and said: 0 Rabah, seek permission for me from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I think that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is under the impression that I have come for the sake of Hafsa.By Allah, if Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) would command me to strike her neck, I would certainly strike her neck. I raised my voice and he pointed me to climb up (and get into his apartment). I visited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he was lying on a mat.I sat down and he drew up his lower garment over him and he had nothing (else) over him, and that the mat had left its marks on his sides. I looked with my eyes in the store room of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I found only a handful of barley equal to one sa' and an equal quantity of the leaves of Mimosa Flava placed in th(t nook of the cell, and a semi-tanned leather bag hanging (in one side), and I was moved to tears (on seeing this extremely austere living of the Holy Piophet), and he said: Ibn Khattab, what wakes you weep? I said: Apostle of Allah, why should I not shed tears?This mat has left its marks on your sides and I do not see in your store room (except these few things) that I have seen ; Ceasar and Closroes are leading their lives in plenty whereas you are Allah's Messenger.His chosen one, and that is your store ! He said: Ibn Khattab, aren't you satisfied that for us (there should be the prosperity) of the Hereafter, and for them (there should be the prosperity of) this world?I said: Yes.And as I had entered I had seen the signs of anger on his face, and I therefore, said: Messenger of Allah, what trouble do you feel from your wives, and if youhave divorced them, verily Allah is with you, His angels, Gabriel, Mika'il, I and Abu Bakr and the believers are with you.And seldom I talked and (which I uttered on that day) I hoped that Allah would testify to my words that I uttered. And so the verse of option (Ayat al-Takhyir) was revealed.Maybe his Lord, if he divorce you, will give him in your place wives better than you . . ." (Ixv. 5).And if you back up one another against him, then surely Allah is his Patron, and Gabriel and the righteous believers, and the angels after that are the aidera (lvi. 4).And it was 'A'isha,daughter of Abu Bakr, and Hafsa who had prevailed upon all the wives of Allah's Prophet (way peace be upon him) for (pressing them for mote money).I said: Messenger of Allah, have you divorced them?He said: No. I said: Messenger of Allah, I entered the mosque and found the Muslims playing with pebbles (absorbed in thought) and saying: Allah's Messenger has divorced his wives.Should I get down and inform there that you have not divorced them?He said: Yes, if you so like. And I went on talking to him until I (found) the signs of anger disappeared on his face and (his seriousness was changed to a happy mood and as a result thereof) his face had the natural tranquillity upon it and he laughed and his teeth were the most charming (among the teeth) of all people.Then Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) climbed down and I also climbed down and catching hold of the wood of the palm-tree and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came down (with such ease) as if he was walking on the ground, not touching anything with his hand (to get support). I said: Messenger of Allah, you remained in your apartment for twenty-nine days.He said: (At times) the month consists of twenty-nine days.I stood at the door of the mosque and I called out at the top of my voice: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has not divorced his wives (and it was on this occasion that this) verse was revealed: "And if any matter pertaining to peace or alarm comes within their ken, they broadcast it; whereas, if they would refer it to the Apostle and those who have been entrusted with authority amongst them, those of them who are engaged in obtaining intelligence would indeed know (what to do with) it" (iv 83). And it was I who understood this matter, and Allah revealed the verse pertaining to option (given to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him in regard to the retaining or divorcing of his wives).
[3508]
Abdullah b. Abbas (Allah be pleased with tlicm) reported: I intended to ask 'Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) about a verse, but I waited for one year to ask him out of his fear, until he went out for Pilgrimage and I also accompanied him.As he came back and we were on the way he stepped aside towards an Arak tree to ease himself.I waited for him until he was free. I then walked along with him and said: Commander of the Faithful, who are the two among the wives of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who backed up one another (in their demand for extra money)?He said: They were Hafsa and 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with them).I said to him: It is for one year that I intended to ask you about this matter but I could not date so on account of the awe for you.He said: Don't do that.If you think that I have any knowledge, do ask me about that.And if I were to know that, I would inform you. He (the narrator) stated that 'Umar had said: By Allah, during the days of ignorance we had no regard for women until Allah the Exalt- ed revealed about them what He has revealed, and appointed (turn) for them what he appointed.He said: It so happened that I was thinking about some matter that my wife said: I wish you had done that and that.I said to her: It does not concern you and you should not feel disturbed in a matter which I intend to do.She said to me: How strange is it that you, O son of Khattab, do not like anyone to retort upon you, whereas your daughter retorts upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upou him) until he spends the day in vexation.'Umar said: I took hold of my cloak, then came out of my house until I visited Hafsa and said to her: O daughter, (I heard) that you retort upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) until he spends the day in vexation, whereupon Hafsa said: By Allah, we do retort upon him.I said: You should bear in mind, my daughter, that I warn you against the punishment of Allah and the wrath of His Messenger (may peace be upon him).You may not be misled by one whose beauty has fascinated her, and the love of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for her.I ('Umar) then visited Umm Salama because of my relationship with her and I talked to her.Umm Salama said to me: Umar b. al-Khattab, how strange is it that you meddle with every matter so much so that you are anxious to interfere between Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and his wives, and this perturbed me so much that I refrained from saying what I had to say, so I came out of her apartment, and I had a friend from the Anar.When I had been absent (from the company of the Holy Prophet) he used to bring me the news and when he had been absent I used to bring him the news, and at that time we dreaded a king of Ghassan. It was mentioned to us that he intended to attack us, and our minds were haunted by him. My friend, the Ansari, came to me, and he knocked at the door and said: Open it, open it. I said: Has the Ghassani come?He said: (The matter is) more serious than that.The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has separated himself from his wives.I said: Let the nose of Hafsa and 'A'isha be besmeared with dust.I then took hold of my cloth and went out until I came and found Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in his attic to which he climbed by means of a ladder made of date-palm, and the servant of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who was black had been sitting at the end of the ladder.I said: This is Umar. So permission was granted to me.I narrated this news to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and as I narrated the news concerning Umm Salama, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled.He was lying on the mat and there was nothing between him and that (mat), and under his head there was a pillow made of leather and it was stuffed with plam fibres and at his feet were lying a heap of sant tree (acacia niloctica, meant for dyeing) and near his head there was hanging a hide.And I saw the marks of the maton the side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and so I wept.He said: What makes you weep? I said: Messenger of Allah, the Khusrau and the Ceasars (spendd their lives in) the midst of (luxuries), whereas you being Allah's Messenger (are leading your life in this poverty).Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Don't you like that they should have riches of their world, and you have the Hereafter.
[3509]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said: I came along with Umar until we reached Marr al-Zahran (the name of a place), and the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated by Sulaiman b. Bilal (except with) the variation (of words) that I said: (What) about these two women?He said: They were Hafsa and Umm Salama. And he made this addition: I came to the apartments and in every apartment there was (the noise) of weeping.And this addition was also made: And he (the Holy Prophet) had taken an oath of remaining away from them for a month, and when twenty-nine days had passed, he visited them.
[3510]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) is reported to have said: I intended to ask Umar about those two ladies who had pressed for (worldly riches) during the lifetime of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him), and I kept waiting for one year, but found no suitable opportunity with him until I happened to accompany him to Mecca.And as he reached Marr al Zahran he went away to answer the call of nature, and he said (to me): Bring me a jug of water, and I took that to him.After having answered the call of nature, as he came back, I began to pour water (over his hands and feet), and I remembered (this event of separation of Allah's Apostle [may peace be upon him] from his wives).So I said to him: Commander of the Faithful, who are the two ladies (who had pressed the Holy Prophet [may peace be upon him] for providing comforts of life) and I had not yet finished my talk when he said: They were 'A'isha and Hafsa.
[3511]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported.I had always been anxious to ask 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) about the two ladies amongst the wives of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon Lim) about whom Allah, the Exalted, said: "If you both turn in repentance to Allah, then indeed your hearts are inclined (to this)" (Ixvi. 4), until 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) set out for Hajj and I also went along with him. And as we were going along a path, 'Umar (Allah be pleased with hiyn) went aside and I also went aside with him with a jug (of water).He answered the call of nature, and then came to me and I poured water over his hands and he performed ablution I said: Commander of the Faithful, who are the two ladies amongst the wives of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) about whom Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, said: 'If you both turn to Allah in repentance, then indeed your heart are inclined to it"? 'Umar (Allah he pleased with him) said: How strange is it for you, Ibn 'Abbas! (Zuhri said: By Allah, he disliked what he asked about, but did not keep it a secret.) He ('Umar) said: They are Hafsa and 'A'isha; and he then began to narrate the hadith and said: We were such people among the Quraish who dominated women, and as we reached Medina we found there people who were dominated by their women, and our women began to learn (the habits) of their women. He further said: And my house was situated in the suburb of Aledina in the tribe of Banu Umayya b. Zaid.One day I became angry with my wife and she retorted upon me. I did not like that she should retort upon me.She said: You disapprove of my retorting upon you By Allah, the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) retort upon him, and one of them detaches herself from him for the day until the night.So I ('Umar) went out and visited Hafsa and said: Do you retort upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)?She said: Yes.I said; Does any one of you detach herself from him from the day to the night?She said: Yes.He said: She who did like it amongst you in fact failed and incurred loss.Does everyone amongst you not fear the wrath of Allah upon her due to the wrath of His Messenger (may peace be upon him), and (as a result thereof) she may perish?So do not retort upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and do not ask him for anything, but ask me that which you desire, (and the frank behaviour) of your companion may not mislead you, if she is more graceful and is dearer to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) than you (meaning 'A'isha) (Allah be pleased with her).He (Hadrat 'Umar further) said: I had a compalaion from the Ansar and, we used to remain in the company of the Messenger (may peace be upon him) turn by turn.He remained there for a day while I remained there on the other day, and he brought me the news about the revelation and other (matter), and I brought him (the news) like this.And we discussed that the Ghassanids were shoeing the horses in order to attack us.Id y companion once attended (the Apostle). and then came to me at night and knocked at my door and called me, and I came out to him, and he said: A matter of great importance has happened. I said: What is that?Have the Ghassanids come?He said: No, but even more serious and more significant than that: the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) has divorced his wives.I said: Hafsa has failed and has incurred loss. and I feared that it would happen.When it was dawn I observed the dawn prayer and dressed myself, and then came there (in the house of the Holy Prophet) and visited Hafsa, and she was weeping. I said: Has Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) divorced you (all)?She said: I do not know.He has, however, separated himself in his attic. I came to a black servant and said to him: Seek permission for 'Umar.He went in and then came to me and said: I made mention of you to him, but he kept quiet. I then went to the pulpit and sat there, and there was a group of people sitting by it and some of then were weeping. I sat there for some time, until I was overpowered (by that very idea) which was in my mind.I then came back to the boy and said to him: Seek permission for Umar. He went in and came to me and said: I made mention of you to him but he kept quiet.I was about to turn back when the boy called me and said: Go in; permission has been granted to you.I went in and greeted Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he was reclining against the couch of mat and it had left its marks upon his side. I said: Messenger of Allah, have you divorced your wives?He raised his head towards me and said: No. I said: Allah is the Greatest.Messenger of Allah, I wish if you had seen how we the people of Quraish had domination over women but when we came to Medina we found people whom their women dominated. So our women began to learn from their women.One dily I became angry with my wife and she began to retort upon me. I did not approve that she should retort upon me. She said: You do not like that I should retort upon you, but, by Allah. the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) retort upon him and any one of them separates herself from him for a day until night. I said: He who did that amongst them in fact failed and incurred loss. Does any of them feel sate from the wrath of Allahupon her due to the wrath of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and she has certainly perished.Allah's Messtnger (may peace be upon him) smiled, I said: Messenger of Allah, I visited Hafsa and said: (The behaviour) of your companion ('A'isha) may not mislead you, If she is more graceful than you and is dearer to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) than you.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled for the second time.I said: Allah's Messenger, way I talk to you about agreeable things?He said: Yes. I sat down and lifted my head (to see things) in the house and, by Allah, I did not see anything significant besides three hides.I said: Messenger of Allah, supplicate the Lord that He should make (life) prosperous for your Ummah as He has made plentiful for the people of Persia and Rome (in spite of the fact) that they do no, worship Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) sat up an I then said : Ibn Khattab, do you doubt that they are a nation whom their nice things have been given immediately in the life of this world.I said: Allah's Messenger! seek pardon for me.And he (Allah's Messenger) had taken an oath that he would not visit them for a month due to extreme annoyance with them until Allah showed His displeasure to him (Allah's Messenger).Zuhri said: 'Urwa informed me that 'A'Isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: When twenty-nine nights were over, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited me, and he began (his visit) with me. I said: Messenger of Allah, you had taken an oath that you would not visit us for a month, while you have visited after I have counted only twenty-nine (nights). Thereupon he said: The month may also be of twenty-nine (days).He then said: 'A'isha, I am going to talk to you about a matter, and you should not be hasty in it (and do not give your final decision) until you have consulted your parents.He then recited this verse to me: "O Prophet, say to your wives" till he reached "mighty reward" (xxxiii. 28). 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: By Allah, he knew that my parents would not allow me to separate from him. I said: Is there any need to consult my parents in this matter? I in fact choose Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him) and the abode in the Hereafter.Ma'mar said: Ayyub reported to me that 'A'isha said: Don't inform your wives that I have chosen you, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Verily Allah has sent me as a conveyer of message, and He has not sent me as a source of hardship (to others).Qatada said: "Saghat qulubukum" means "Your hearts have inclined."
[3512]
Fatima bint Qais reported that Abu 'Amr b. Hafs divorced her absolutely when he was away from home, and he sent his agent to her with some barley.She was displeased with him and when he said: I swear by Allah that you have no claim on us. she went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and mentioned that to him. He said: There is no maintenance due to you from him, and he commanded her to spend the 'Idda in the house of Umm Sharik, but then said: That is a woman whom my companions visit. So better spend this period in the house of Ibn Umm Maktum, for he is a blind man and yon can put off your garments. And when the 'Idda is over, inform me. She said: When my period of 'Idda was over, I mentioned to him that Mu'awiya b. Abu Sufyan and Jahm had sent proposal of marriage to me, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: As for Abu Jahm, he does not put down his staff from his shoulder, and as for Mu'awiya, he is a poor man having no property; marry Usama b. Zaid.I objected to him, but he again said: Marry Usama; so I married him.Allah blessed there in and I was envied (by others).
[3513]
Fatima bint Qais reported that her husband divorced her during the life time of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) and gave her a meagre maintenance allowance.When she saw that, she said: By Allah, I will inform Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and if maintenance allowance is due to me then I will accept that which will suffice me, and if it is not due to me, I will not accept anything from him.She said: I made a mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he said: There is neither maintenance allowance for you nor lodging.
[3514]
Fatima bint Qais reported that her husband al-Makhzulmi divorced her and refused to pay her maintenance allowance.So she came to Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) and informed him, whereupon he said: There is no maintenance allowance for you, and you better go to the house of Ibn Umm Maktum and live with him for he is a blind man and you can put off your clothes in his house (i.e. you shall not face much difficulty in observing purdah there).
[3515]
Abu Salama reported that Fatima bint Qais, the sister of al-Dahhak b. Qais informed him that Abu Hafs b. Mughira al-Makhzumi divorced her three times and then he proceeded on to the Yemen.The members of his family said to her: There is no maintenance allowance due to you from us.Khalid b. Walid along with a group of persons visited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the house of Maimuna and they said: Abu Hafs has divorced his wife with three pronouncements; is there any maintenance allowance due to her?Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: No maintenance allowance is due to her, but she is required to spend the 'Idda; and he sent her the message that she should not be hasty in making a decision about herself and commanded her to move to the house of Umm Sharik, and then sent her the message that as the first immigrants (frequently) visit the house of Umm Sharik, she should better go to the house of Ibn Umm Maktum, the blind, (and further said: In case you put off your head-dress, he (Ibn Umm Makhtum) will not see you.So she went to his house, and when the 'Idda was over, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married her to Usama b. Zaid b. Haritha.
[3516]
Fatima bint Qais reported: I had been married to a person from Banu Makhzum and he divorced me with irrevocable divorce. I sent a message to his family asking for maintenance allowance, and the rest of the hadith has been transmitted with a slight change of words.
[3517]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported that she had been married to Abu 'Amr b. Hafs b. al-Mughira and he divorced her with three pronouncements. She stated that she went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asking him about abandoning that house.He commanded her to move to the house of Ibn Umm Maktum, the blind.Marwan refused to testify the divorced woman abandoning her house (before the 'Idda was over).'Urwa said that 'A'isha objected to (the words of) Fatima bint Qais.This hadith has been transmitted through another chain of narrators.
[3518]
'Ubaidullah b. 'Abdullah b. 'Utba reported that 'Amr b. Hafs b. al-Mughira set out along with 'Ali b. Abi Talib (Allah be pleased with him) to the Yemen and sent to his wife the one pronouncement of divorce which was still left from the (irrevocable) divorce; and he commanded al-Harith b. Hisham and 'Ayyash b. Abu Rabi'a to give her maintenance allowance.They said to her: By Allah, there is no maintenance allowance for you, except in case you are pregnant.She came to Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) and mentioned their opinion to him, whereupon he said: There is no maintenance allowance for you.Then she sought permission to move (to another place), and he (the Holy Prophet) permitted her.She said: Allah's Messenger, where (should I go)?He said: To the house of Ibn Umm Maktum and, as he is blind, she could put off her garmeqts in his presence and he would not see her.And when her 'Idda was over. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) married her to Usama b. Zaid.Marwan (the governor of Medina) sent Qabisa b. Dhuwaib in order to ask her about this hadith, and she narrated it to him, whereupon Marwan said: We have not heard this hadith but from a woman.We would adopt a safe (path) where we found the people.Fatima said that when these words of, Marwan were conveyed to her.There is between me and you the word of Allah,the Exalted and Majestic: Do "not turn them out"of their houses.She asserted: This is in regard to the revocable divorce what new (turn can the event take) after three pronouncements (separation between irrevocable).Why do you say there is no maintenance allowance for her if she is not pregnant ? Then on what ground do you restrain her ?
[3519]
Sha'bi reported: I visited Fatima bint Qais and asked her about the verdict of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about (board and lodging during the 'Idda) and she said that her husband divorced her with an irrevocable divorce. She (further.said): I contended with him before Allah's Messerger (may peace be upon him) about lodging and maintenance allowance, and she said: He did not provide me with any lodging or maintenance allowance, and he commanded me to spend the 'Idda in the house of Ibn Umm Maktum.
[3520]
A hadith like this has been trarismitted on the authority of Hushaim through another chain of narrators.
[3521]
Sha'bi reported: We visited Fitima hint Qais and she served us fresh dates and a drink of barley flour, and I asked where should a woman who has been divorced by three pronouncements, spend the period of her 'Idda.She said: My husband divorced me with three pronouncements, and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) permitted me to spend my 'Idda period in my family (with my parents).
[3522]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that there is no lodging and maintenance allowance for a woman who has been given irrevocable divorce.
[3523]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported: My husband divorced me with three pronouncements.I decided to move (from his house to another place).So I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he said: Move to the house of your cousin 'Amr b. Umm Maktum and spend your period of 'Idda there.
[3524]
Abu Ishaq reported: I was with al-Aswad b. Yazid sitting in the great mosque, and there was with us al-Sha'bi, and he narrated the narration of Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not make any provision for lodging and maintenance allowance for her.Al-Aswad caught hold of some pebbles in his fist and he threw them towards him saying: Woe be to thee, you narrate like it, whereas Umar said: We cannot abandon the Book of Allah and the Sunnah of our Apostle (may peace be upon him) for the words of a woman.We do not know whether she remembers that or she forgets.For her, there is a provision of lodging and maintenance allowance.Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, said: "Turn them not from their houses nor should they themselves go forth unless they commit an open indecency" (lxv. 1).
[3525]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ishaq with the same chain of transmitters.
[3526]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported that her husband divorced her with three, pronouncements and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made no provision for her lodging and maintenance allowance.She (further said): Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: When your period of 'Idda is over, inform me.So I informed him. (By that time) Mu'awiya, Abu Jahm and Usama b. Zaid had given her the proposal of marriage.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: So far as Mu'awiya is concerned, he is a poor man without any property.So far as Abu Jahm is concerned, he is a great beater of women, but Usama b. Zaid ... She pointed with her hand (that she did not approve of the idea of marrying) Usama.But Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon himn) said: Obedience to Allah and obedience to His Messenger is better for thee.She said: So I married him, and I became an object of envy.
[3527]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported: My husband Abu 'Amr b. Hafs b. al-Mughira sent 'Ayyish b. Abu Rabi'a to me with a divorce, and he also sent through him five si's of dates and five si's of barley.I said: Is there no maintenance allowance for me but only this, and I cannot even spend my 'Idda period in your house?He said: No. She said: I dressed myself and came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).He said: How many pronouncements of divorce have been made for you?I said: Three.He said what he ('Ayyish b. Abu Rabi'a) had stated was true.There is no maintenance allowance for you.Spend 'Idda period in the house of your cousin, Ibn Umm Maktum.He is blind and you can put off your garment in his presence.And when you have spent your Idda period, you inform me. She said: Mu'awiya and Abu'l-Jahm (Allah be pleased with them) were among those who had given me the proposal of marriage.Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Mu'awiya is destitute and in poor condition and Abu'l-Jahm is very harsh with women (or he beats women, or like that), you should take Usama b. Zaid (as your husband).
[3528]
Abu Bakr b. Abu'l-Jahm reported: I and Abu Salama b 'Abd al-Rahman came to fatima bint Qais (Al!ah be pleased with her) and asked her (about divorce, etc.). She said: I was the wife of Abu 'Amr b. Hafs b. al-Mughira, and he set out to join the battle of Najran. The rest of the hadith is the same, but he made this addition: "She said: I married him and Allah hornoured me on account of Ibn Zaid and Allah favoured me because of him."
[3529]
Abu Bakr reported: I and Abu Salama came to Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) during the time of Ibn Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) and she narrated to us that her husband gave her an irrevocable divorce. (The rest of the hadith is the same.)
[3530]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported: My husband divorced me with three pronouncements and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made no provision for lodging and maintenance allowance.
[3531]
Hisham reported on the authority of his father that Yahya b. Sa'id b. al-'As married the daughter of 'Abd al-Rahman b. al-Hakam, and he divorced her and he turned her out from his house.'Urwa (Allah be -pleased with him) criticised this (action) of theirs (the members of the family of her in-laws).They said: Verily, Fatima too went out (of her in-laws' house).'Urwa said: I came to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and told her about it and she said: There is no good for Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) in making mention of it.
[3532]
Fatima bint Qais (Allah be pleased with her) reported that she said: Allah's Messenger, my husband has divorcee me with three pronouncements and I am afraid that I may be put to hardship, and so he commanded her and so she moved (to another house).
[3533]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: It is no good for Fatima to make mention of it, i.e. her statement: " There is no lodging and maintenance allowance (for the divorced women)."
[3534]
Ibn al-Qasim narrated on the authority of his father that 'Urwa b. Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) said to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her): Didn't you see that such and such daughter of al-Hakam was divorced by her husband with an irrevocable divorce, and she left (the house of her husband) ? Thereupon 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: It was bad that she did.He ( Urwa) said: Have you not heard the words of Fatima?Thereupon she said : There if no good for her in making mention of it.
[3535]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: My maternal aunt was divorced, and she intended to pluck her dates.A person scolded her for having come out (during the period of 'Idda).She came to Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him.) and he said: Certainly you can pluck (dates) from your palm trees, for perhaps you may give charity or do an act of kindness.
[3536]
'Ubaidullah b. 'Abdullah b. 'Utba (b. Mas'ud) reported that his father wrote to Umar b. 'Abdullah b al Arqam al-Zuhri that he would go to Subai'ah bint al-Hirith al-Aslamiyya (Allah be pleased with her) and ask her about a verdict from him which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave her when she had asked that from him (in regard to the termination of 'Idda at the birth of a child) 'Umar b. Abdullah wrote to 'Abdullah b.'Utba informing him that Subai'ah had told him that she had been married to Sa'd b. Khaula and he belonged to the tribe of Amir b. Lu'ayy, and was one of those who participated in the Battle of Badr, and he died in the Farewell Pilgrimage and she had been in the family way at that time.And much time had not elapsed that she gave birth to a child after his death and when she was free from the effects of childbirth she embellished herself for those who had to give proposals of marriage.Abd al-Sunabil b. Ba'kak (from Banu 'Abd al-Dar) came to her and said: What is this that I see you embellished ; perhaps you are inclined to marry, By Allah, you cannot marry unless four months and ten days (of 'Idda are passed). When he said that. I dressed myself, and as it was evening I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and asked him about it, and he gave me a religious verdict that I was allowed to marry when I had given birth to a child and asked me to marry if I so liked.Ibn Shihab said: I do not find any harm fur her in marrying when she has given birth to a child even when she is bleeding (after the birth of the child) except that her husband should not go near her until she is purified.
[3537]
Abu Salama b. 'Abd al-Rahman and Ibn 'Abbas.(Allah be pleased with them) got together in the house of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) and began to discuss about the woman who gave birth to a child a few nights after the death of her husband.Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with then)) said: Her 'Idda is that period which is longer of the two (between four months and ten days and the birth of the child, whichever is longer).AbuSalama,however said: Her period of 'Idda is over (with the birth of the child), and they were contending with each other over this issue, whereupon Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) said: I subscribe (to the view) held by my nephew (i.e. Abu Salama). They sent Kuraib (the freed slave of Ibn 'Abbas) to Umm Salama to ask her about it.He came (back) to them and informed them that Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her) said that Subai'ah al-Aslamiyya gave birth to a child after the death of her husband when the few flights (had hardly) passed and she made mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he commanded her to marry.
[3538]
This hadith has been narated with the same chain of transrmitters except with a small change of words (and that is): They sent him to Umm Salama, but no mention was made of Kuraib.
[3539]
Zainab (bint Abu Salama) (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I went to Umm Habiba, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), when her father Abu Sufyan had died.Umm Habiba sent for a perfume having yellowness in it or something else like it, and she applied it to a girl and then rubbed it on her cheeks and then said: By Allah, I need no perfume but for the fact that I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say on the pulpit: "It is not permissible for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafter to mourn for the dead beyond three days, but (in case of the death) of the husband it is permissible for four months and ten days." Zainab said: I then visited Zainab hint Jahsh (Allah be pleased with her) when her brother died and she sent for perfume and applied it and then said: By Allah, I don't feel any need for the perfume but that I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say on the pulpit: "It is not permissible for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafbler to mourn the dead beyond three days except in case of her husband (for whom she can mourn) for four months and ten days." Zainab (Allah be pleased with her) said: I heard my mother Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her) as saying: A woman came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger.I have a daughter whose husband has died and there has developed some trouble in her eye; should we apply collyrium to it?Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: No (repeating it twice or thrice, saying only ,NO" all the time).Then he said: It is only four mouths and ten days, whereas in the preIslamic period none of you threw away the dung until one year had passed.Humaid said: I said to Zainab: What is this throwing of dung until a year is passed? Zainab said: When the husband of a woman died, she went into a hut and put on her worst clothes, and did not apply perfume or something like it until a year was over.Then an animal like a donkey, or a goat, or a bird was brought to her and she rubbed her hand over it, and it so happened that one on which she rubbed her hand died.She then came out of her house and she was given dung and she threw it and then she made use of anything like perfume or something else as she liked.
[3540]
Zainab bint Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her) reported that a relative of Umm Habiba (Allah he pleased with her) died. She sent for a yellow (perfume) and applied that to her forearm and said: I, am doing it, for I have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: It is not permissible for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafter to mourn beyond three days except the husband (for whom she can mourn) for four months and ten days, This hadith was narrated by Zainab from her mother and from Zainab, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), or from some other lady from among the wives of the Prophet (may peace be upon him).
[3541]
Zainab bint Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her) reported on the authority of her mother that a woman lost her husband. (As her eyes were ailing) they (her kith and kin) entertained fear about her eyes, so they came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and sought permission for the use of collyrium, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: One among you used to spend one year in a dungeon dressed in worst clothes. (And at the end of this period) she threw dung at the dog which happened to pass that way and then she came out (of her 'Idda). Can't she (wait) even for four months and ten days?
[3542]
Humaid b. Nafi' narrated two traditions from Umm Salama dealing with collyrium and the other hadith from the wives of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) except with this that no mention was made of Zainab.
[3543]
Zainab bint Abu Salama reported: Umm Salama and Umm Habiba (Allah be pleased with them) were talking with each other (and saying) that a woman came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and mentioned to him that her daughter had lost her husband, and her eyes were sore and she wnted to use collyrium, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: One among you used to throw dung at the end of a year, and now (this abstinence from adornment) is only for four months and ten days.
[3544]
Zainab bint Abu Salama reported that when the news of the death of Abu Safyan came to Umm Habiba she sent for yellow (perfume) on the third day and rubbed it on her forearms and on her cheeks and said: I had in fact no need of it, but I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not permissible for the women believing in Allah and the Hereafter to abstain from adornment beyond three days except (at the death of) husband (in which case she must abstain from adornment) for four months and ten days.
[3545]
Safiyya bint Abu 'Ubaid reported on the authority of Hafsa or 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with thein) or from both of them that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) said: It is not permissible for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafter (or believing in Allah and His Messenger) that she should observe mourning for the dead beyond three days except in case of her husband.
[3546]
A hadith like this is transmitted on the authority of Nafi'
[3547]
Safiyya bint Abu 'Ubaid reported that she heard Hafsa daughter of Umar (Allah be pleased with them), (and) wife of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him), narrating a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and she made this addition: "She should abstain from adorning herself (in case of the death of her husband) for four months and ten days."
[3548]
Safiyya bint Abu 'Ubaid narrated this tradition of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) on the authority of some wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him)
[3549]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not permissible for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafter to observe mourning on the dead for more than three (days), except in case of her husband.
[3550]
Umm 'Atiyya (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: A woman must not observe mouriaing for one who had died for more than three (days) except for four months and ten days in the case of her husband. and she must not wear a dyed garment except one of the types made of dyed yarn, or apply collyrium, or touch perfume except a little perfume or incense, when she has been purified after her courses.
[3551]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of narrators but with a slight variation of words.
[3552]
Umm 'Atiyya ('Allah be pleased with her) said: We were forbidden to observe mourning for the dead beyond three days except in the case of husband (where it is permissible) for four months and ten days, and (that during this period) we should neither use collyrium nor touch perfume, nor wear dyed clothes, but concession was given to a woman when one of us was purified of our courses to make use of a little incense or scent.
[3553]
Sahl b. Sa'd al-Sa'idi reported that'Uwaimir al-'Ajlani came to 'Asim b. 'Adi al-Ansari and said to him. Tell me about a person who finds a man with his wife; should he kill him, and be killed In retaliation; or how should he act? 'Asim, ask for me (religious verdict about it) from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).So 'Asim asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he did not like this question and he disapproved of it so much that'Asim felt aggrieved at what he had heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).When 'Asim came back to his family, 'Uwaimir came to him and said: 'Asim, what did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say to you?'Asim said to 'Uwaimir: You did not bring something good.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not like this religious verdict that I sought from him. 'Uwaimir said: By Allah, I will not rest until I have asked him about it.'Uwaimir proceeded until he came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he was sitting amidst people, and said: Messenger of Allah, tell me about a person who found a man with his wife.Should he kill him, and then you would kill him, or how should he act?Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: (Verses) have been revealed concerning you and your wife; so go and bring her.Sahl said that they both invoked curses (and further said): I was along with people in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).And when they had finished, Uwaimir said: Allah's Messenger, I shall have told a lie against her if I keep her (now).So he divorced her with three pronouncements before Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had commanded him.Ibn Shihab said: Subsequently that was the practice of invokers of curses (al Mutala'inain)
[3554]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported.. 'Uwaimir al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) from Banu'l-'Ajlan came to 'Asim b. 'Adi (Allah be pleased with him) the remaining part of the hadith is the same and it was also reecorded in it: "And subsequebtly the separation became the practice of al-Mutala'inain." And this addition was also made: "She was pregnant and her son was ascribed to her, and it became customary that such (a son) would inherit her and she would inherit him in the share prescribed by Allah for her.
[3555]
Ibn Shihab narrated about the invokers of curses and the practice of (li'an) based on the authority of Sahl b. Sa'd, of the tribe of Sa'ida. that a person from the Ansar came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, tell me about the person who found a man with his wife.The remaining part of the hadith is the same (but) with this addition: They invoked curses in the mosque and I was present there.And he narrated in the hadith: He divorced her with three pronouncements before Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded him (to get separation).He separated from her in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: There is a separation between the invokers of curses.
[3556]
Sa'id b Jubair reported: I was asked about the invokers of curses during the reign of Mus'ab (b.Zubair) whether they could separate (themselves by this process). He said: I did not understand what to say.So I went to the house of Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) in Mecca.I said to his servant: Seek permission for Me. He said that he (Ibn 'Umar) had been taking rest.He (Ibn 'Umar) heard my voice. and said: Are you Ibn Jubair?I said: Yes.He'said: Come in.By Allah, it must be some (great) need which has brought you here at this Hour.So I got in and found him lying on a blanket reclining against a pillow stuffed with fibres of date-palm. I said: O Abu'Abd al-Rahman, should there be separation between the invokers of curses? He said: Hallowed be Allah, yes,The first one who asked about it was so and so. he said: Messenger of Allah, tell me If one of us finds his wife committing adultery: what should he do?If he talks, that is something great, and if he keeps quiet that is also (something great) (which he cannot afford to do).Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) kept quiet (or some time). After some time he (that very person) came to him (Allah's Messenger) and said: I have been involved in that very cage about which I had asked you Allah the Exalted and Majestic then revealed (these) verses of Surah Nur: "Those who accuse their wives" (verse 6), and he (the Holy Prophet) recited them to him and admonished him, and exhorted him and informed him that the torment of the world is less painful than the torment of the Hereafter.He said: No, by Him Who sent you with Truth, I did not tell a lie against her.He (the Holy Prophet) then called her (the wife of that person who had accused her) and admonished her, and exhorted her, and informed her that the torment of this world is less painful than the torment of the Hereafter.She said: No, by Him Who sent thee with Truth, he is a liar. (it was) the man who started the swearing of oath and he swore in the name of Allah four times that he was among the truthful. and at the fifth turn he said: Let there be curse of Allah upon him if he were among the liars.Then the woman was called and she swore four times in the name of Allah that he (her husband) was among the liars, and at the fifth time (she said): Let there be curse upon her if he were among the truthful.He (the Holy Prophet) then effected separation between the two.A hadith like this is narrated by Ibn Numair with a slight variation of words.
[3557]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying to the invokers of curse: Your account is with Allah. One of you must be a liar.You have now no right over this woman.He said: Messenger of Allah, what about my wealth (dower that I paid her at the time of marriage)? He said: You have no claim to wealth.If you tell the truth, it (dower) is the recompense for your having had the right to intercourse with her, and if you tell a lie against her, it is still more remote from you than she is. Zuhair said in his narration: Sufyan reported to us on the authority of 'Amr that he had heard Sa'id b Jubair saying: I heard Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said it.
[3558]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) effected separation between the two members of Banu al-'Ajlan, and said: Allah knows that one of you is a liar.Is there one to repent among you?
[3559]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: I asked Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) about invoking curse (li'an), and he narrated Similarly from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[3560]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported that Mus'ab b. Zubair did not effect separation between the Mutala'inain (invokers of curses).Sa'id said: It was mentioned to 'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) and he said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) effected separation between the two members of Banu al-'Ajlan.
[3561]
Nafi' reported on the authority of Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that a person invoked curse on the wife during the lifetime of Allah s Messenger (may peace be upon him), so he effected separation between them and traced the lineage of the son to his mother.
[3562]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked a person from the Anger and his wife to invoke curse (upon one another in order to testify to their truthfulness), and then effected separation between them.
[3563]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidulah with the same chain of transmitters.
[3564]
'Abdullah reported: We were on the night of Friday staying in the mosque when a person from the Ansar came there and said: If a person finds hiswoman along with a man, and he speaks about it, you would lash him, and if he kills, you will kill him, and if he keeps quiet he shall have to consume anger.By Allah, I will definitely ask about him from Allah's Mescenger (may peace be upon him). On the following day he came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and asked him thus: If a man were to find with his wife a man and if he were to talk about it, you would lash him; and if he killed, you would kill him, and if he were to keep quiet. he would consume anger, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Allah, solve (this problem), and he began to supplicate (before Him), and then the verses pertaining to li'an were revealed: "Those who accuse their wives and have no witnesses except themselves" (xxiv. 6).The person was then put to test according to these verses in the presence of the people.There came he and his wife in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and they invoked curses (in order to testify their claim).The man swore four times in the name of Allah that he was one of the truthful and then invoked curse for the fifth time saying: Let there be curse of Allah upon him if he were among the liars.Then she began to invoke curse.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to her: just wait (and curse after considering over it), but she refused and invoked curse and when she turned away, he (Allah's Apostle) said: It seems that this woman shall give birth to a curly-haired black child, And so she did gave birth to a curly-haired black child.
[3565]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of A'mash.
[3566]
Muhammad (one of the narrators) reported: I asked Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) knowing that he had a knowledge of (the case of li'an).He said: Hilal b. Umayya (Allah be pleased with him) accused his wife with the charge of fornication with Sharik b. Sahma, the brother of al-Bara'b Malik from the side of his mother.And he was the first person who invoked curse (li'an) in Islam.He in fact invoked curse upon her.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: See to her if she gives birth to a white-complexioned child having dark hair and bright eyes; he must be the son of Hilal b. Umayya; and if she gives birth to a child with dark eyelids, curly hair and lean shanks, he must be the offspring of Sharik b. Sahma . He said: I was informed that she gave birth to a child having dark eyelids, curly hair and lean shanks.
[3567]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Mention was made of li'an in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).And Asim b. 'Adi passed a remark about it and then turned away, and a man of his tribe came to him complaining that he had found a man with his wife, whereupon 'Asim said: I have been taken by my words.He took him to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and told him about the man whom he had found with his wife and this man was a lean, yellow-coloured man with lank hair, and the person who was accused of committing adultery with her (his wife) had fleshy shanks, with wheat complexion and heavy bulk.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah, make (this case) manifest.And as she gave birth to a child, whose face resembled that person about whom her husband had made mention that he had found her with, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be, upon him) had asked them to invoke curses. A person said to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him): Is she (that woman) about whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upen him) (said): "If I were to stone anybody without evidence, I would have stoned her"? Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) said: No, it is not she.That woman was one who openly spread evil in society. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) through another chain of transmitters with the addition of these words: 'With flesh, and curly tangled hair."
[3568]
'Abdullah b Shaddad reported that mention was made about the invokers of curses before Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them).Ibn Shaddad said: Are these the two about whom Allah's Apostle (clay peace be upon him) said. "If I were to stone one without evidence, I would have definitely stoned her"? Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said: She is not this woman; but she is the one who (committed adultery) openly.
[3569]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Sa'd b. 'Ubada al-Ansari said: Messenger of Allah, tell the if a man finds his wife with another person, should he kill him?Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: No. Sa'd said: Why not? I swear by Him Who has honoured you with Truth. There upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Listen to what your chief says.
[3570]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Sa'd b. Ubada (Allah be pleased with him) said: Messenger of Allah, if I were to find with my wife a man, should I wait until I bring four witnesses?He said: Yes.
[3571]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Sa'd b. Ubada (Allah be pleased with him) said: Messenger of Allah, if I were to find with my wife a man, should I not touch him before bringing four witnesses?Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Yes.He said: By no means.By Him Who has sent you with the Truth, I would hasten with my sword to him before that. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Listen to what your chief says.He is jealous of his honour, I am more jealous than he (is) and God is more jealous than I.
[3572]
AI-Mughira b. Shu'ba (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Sa'd b. 'Ubada (Allah be pleased with him) said: If I were to see a man with my wife, I would have struck him with the sword, and not with the flat part (side) of it.When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) heard of that, he said: Are you surprised at Sa'd's jealousy of his honour?By Allah, I am more jealous of my honour than he, and Allah is more jealous than I. Because of His jealousy Allah has prohibited abomination, both open and secret And no person is more jealous of his honour than Allah, and no persons, is more fond of accepting an excuse than Allah, on account of which He has sent messengers, announcers of glad tidings and warners; and no one is more fond of praise than Allah on account of which Allah has promised Paradise.
[3573]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority, of 'Abd al-Malik b. Umair with the same chain of narraters but with a slight change of words.
[3574]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: There came a person to the Holy Prophet (may peace he upon him)) from Banu Fazara and said: My wife has given birth to a child who is black, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Have you any camels?He said: Yes. He again said: What is this colour? He said: They are red.He said: Is there a dusky one among them? He said: Yes, there are dusky ones among them He said: How has it come about? He said: It is perhaps the strain to which it has reverted, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: It is perhaps the strain to which he (the child) has reverted.
[3575]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ma'mar, the (words are): "Messenger of Allah, my wife has given birth to a dark-complexioned boy, and he at that time was intending to disown him." And this addition has been made at the end of the hadith: "He (the Holy Prophet) did not permit him to disown him."
[3576]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: A desert Arab came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: My wife has given birth to a dark-complexioned child and I have disowned him.Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Have you any camels? He said: Yes. He said: What is their colour?He said?They are red.He said: Is there anyone dusky among them? He said: Yes.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: How has it come about? He said: Messenger of Allah, it is perhaps due to the strain to which it has reverted, whereupon the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: It (the birth) of the black child may be due to the strain to which he (the child) might have reverted.
[3577]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3578]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone emancipates his share ina slave and has enough money to pay the full price for him, a fair price for the slave should be fixed, his partners given their shares, and the slave be thus emancipated, otherwise he is emancipated only to the extent of the first man's share.
[3579]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[3580]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The slave who is jointly owned by two persons, and is emancipated by one of them, (this one) has liability (upon him to secure complete freedom for that slave).
[3581]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased witli him) reported Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone emancipates a share in a slave, he is to be completely emancipated if he has money; but if he has none, the slave will be required to work to pay for his freedom, but must not be over-burhened.
[3582]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sa'id b. Abu 'Aruba with the same chain of transmitters but with the addition: "If he (one of the joint owners emancipating the slave) has not (enough) money (to secure freedom for the other half) a fair price for the slave should be fixed, and he will be required to work to pay for his freedom, but must not be over-burdened.
[3583]
A hadith like this is reported on the authority of the same chain of transmitters but with a slight change of words.
[3584]
Ibn Umar reported that 'A'isha decided to buy a slave-girl and then set her free, but her masters said: We are prepared to sell her to you on the condition that her right of inheritance would vest with you. She (Hadrat A'isha) made a mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) whereupon he said: This should not stand in your way. The right of inheritance vests in one who emancipates.
[3585]
'A'isha (Allah be pjeased with her) reported that Barira came to her in order to seek her help in securing freedom,but she had (so far) paid nothing out of that sum stipulated in the contract.'A'isba said to her.Go to your family (who owns you), and if they like that I should pay the amount (of the contract) on your behalf (for purchasing your freedom), then I shall have the right in your inheritance. (If they accepted it) I am prepared (to make this payment).Barira made a mention of that to the (members of) her family, but they refused and said: If she (Hadrat 'A'isha) wants to do good to You for the sake of Allah, she may do it, but the right of inheritance will be ours.She (Hadrat 'A'isha) made a mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he said to her: Buy her, and emancipate her, for the right of inheritance vests with one who emancipates (the slave).Allah's Messenger, may peace be upon him) then stood up and said: What has happened to the people that they lay down conditions which are not (found) in the Book of Allah?And he who laid down a condition not found in the Book of Allah, that is not valid. even if it is laid down hundred times.The condition laid down by Allah is the most weighty and the most valid.
[3586]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported: Barira came to me and said: 'A'isha, I have entered into contract for securing freedom with my family (who owns me) for nine 'uqiyas (of silver), one 'uqiya every year The rest of the hadith is the same (but with this addition): "This (the problem of the right of inheritance) should not stand in your way.Buy her, and set her free. He said in a hadith: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up among men, extolled Allah, praised Him, and then said: "for......"
[3587]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Barira came to me and said: My family (owners) have made contract with me (for granting freedom) for nine 'uqiyas (of silver) payable in nine years, one 'uqiya every year.Help me (in making this payment). I said to her: If your family so desires, I am prepared to make them the full payment in one instalment, and thus secure freedom for you, but the right of inheritance will vest in me,if I do so.She (Barira) made a mention of that to her family, but they refused (except) on the condition that the right of inheritance would vest in them.She came to me and made mention of if She ('A'isha) said: I scolded her.She (Barira) said: By Allah, it is not possible (they will never agree to it).And as she was saying it, Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) heard, and he asked me, I informed him and he said: Buy her and emancipate her, and let the right of inherit- ance vest in them, for they cannot claim it (rightfully) since the right of inherritance vests with one who emancipates (the slave; therefore, these people have no right to lay such false claims).And I did so.She ('A'isha) said: Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) delivered a sermon in the evening.He extolled Allah and praised Him with what He deserves, and then said afterwards,: What has happened to the people that they lay down conditions which are not found in the Book of Allah? And the condition which is not found in the Book of Allah is invalid, even if its number is one hundred.The Book of Allah is more true (than any other deed) and the condition laid down by Allah is more binding (than any other condition). What has happened to the people among you that someone among you says: "Emancipate so and so, but the right of inheritance vests in me"?Verily, the right of inheritance vests in one who emancipates.
[3588]
Hisham b. 'Urwa narrated a hadith like this with the same chain of trans- mitters except (with this change) that in the hadith transmitted on the authority of jartr (the words are): Her (Barira's) husband was a slave, so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave her the option (either to retain her matrimonial relation with her husband or sever it off). She opted to break off (and secure freedom for her even from the matrimonial alliance). And if he were free he would not have given her the option. In the hadith narrated on the authority (of this chain of transmitters) these words are not found: Amma ba'du.
[3589]
'Abd al-Rahman b. al.Qasim reported on the authority of his father: 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: There were three issues which were clarified in case of Barira: her owners had decided to sell her on the condition that the right of her inheritance would vest with them.She ('A'isha) said: I made a mention of that to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he said: Buy her and emancipate her, for verily the right of inheritance vests with one who emancipates. She said that she emancipated (her) and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave her the option (either to retain her matrimonial alliance or break it after emancipation).She (taking advantage of the option) opted for herself (the severing of matrimonial alliance). 'A'isha said: The people used to give her charity and she gave us that as gift. I made a mention of it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: That is charity for her but gift for you, so take that.
[3590]
'A'isha (Allah's be pleased with her) reported that she had bought Barira from the people of Ansar, but they laid down the condition that the right of inheritance (would vest in them), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The right of inheritance vests with one who shows favour (who emancipates) and Allah's Messenger (may peacebe upon him) gave her the choice (either to retain) her matrimonial alliance or break it).Her husband was a slave.She (Barira also) gave 'A'isha some meat as gift.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said:I wish you could prepare (cook) for us out of this meat. 'A'isha said,It has been given as charity to Barira, whereupon he said: That is charity for her and gift for us.
[3591]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: She wanted to buy Barira with a view to emancipating her.They (the sellers) laid down the condition that the right of inheritance would vest (with them).She (Hadrat 'A'isha) made a mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Buy her and emancipate her for the right of inheritance vests with one who emancipates.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was given meat as gift.They (his Companions) said to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): This was given as charity to Barira, whereupon he said: That is charity for her but gift for us.And she was given option (to retain her matrimonial alliance or to break it).Abd al-Rahman said: Her husband was a free man.Shu'ba said: I then asked him (one of the narrators) about Barira's husband (whether he had been a free mart or a slave), whereupon he said: I do not know.
[3592]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[3593]
'A'isha reported that the husband of Barira was a slave.
[3594]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her). the wife of Allah's Apostle (may Peace be upon him) said: Three are the Sunan (usages) (that we came to know in case of Bairara).She was given option in regard to her husband when she was emancipated. Sbe was given meat as charity.Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) visited me when an earthen pot with meat in it was placed on the fire.He asked for food and be was given bread with ordinary meat (usually cooked in the) house. Thereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: Don't I see the earthen pot on fire with meat in it? They said: Yes.Allah's Messenger, there is meat in it which was given as charity to Barira. We did not deem it advisable that we should give you that to eat, whereupon he said: It is charity for her, but it is gift for us.Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) also said: The right of inheritance vests with one who emancipates.
[3595]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: 'A'isha (Allah be pleated with her) thought of buying a slave-girl and emancipating her, but her owners refused to (sell her but on the condition) that the right of inheritance would vest in them.She made a mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). whereupon he said: Let this (condition) not stand in your way for the right of inheritance vests with one who emancipates.
[3596]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) forbade the selling and making a gift of the right of inheritance of a slave.Imam Muslim said: All the persons depend upon Abdullah b. Dinar in regard to this hadith.
[3597]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) through another chain of transmitters but with this change that in tba hadith narrated by al-Thaqafi from Ubaidullah there is only a mention of selling (or right of inheritance, al-Wala' ) but not that of making a gift.
[3598]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) made it obligatory for every tribe (the payment) of blood-wit; he then also made it explicit that it is not permissible for a Muslim to make himself the ally (of the slave emancipated by another) Muslim without his permission. He (the narrator further added): I was informed that he (the Holy Prophet) cursed the one who did that (and it was recorded) in his Sahifa (in a document).
[3599]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who takes anyone as his ally without the consent of his previous master, there will be the curse of Allah and that of His angels upon him, and neither, any obligatory act of his nor the supererogatory one will be accepted (by Allah).
[3600]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who took the freed slave as his ally without the consent of his previous master, there is upon him the curse of Allah and that of His angels and that of the whole mankind, and there will not be accepted from him his obligatory acts or supercrogatory acts on the Day of Resurrection.This hadith is narrated through the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight change of words.
[3601]
Ibrahim al-Taimi reported on the authority of his father: 'Ali b. Abu Talib (Allah be pleased with him) addressed us and said: He who thinks that we (the members of the Prophet's family) read anything else besides the Book of Allah and this Sahifa (and he said that Sahifa was tied to the scabbard of the sword) tells a lie. (This Sahifa) contains (problems) pertaining to the ages of the camels and (the recompense) of the injuries, and it also records the words of the Prophet (may peace be upon him): Medina is a sacred territory from 'Ayr to Thaur (it is most probably Uhud).He who innovates (an act or practice) or gives protection to an innovator, there is a curse of Allah and that of His angels and that of the whole humanity upon him.Allah will not accdpt from him (as a recompense) any obligatory act or supererogatory act, and the responsibility of the Muslims is a joint responsibility; even the lowest in rank can undertake the responsibility (on behalf of others), and he who claims anyone else as his father besides his own father or makes one his ally other than the one (who freed him), there is a curse of Allah. that of His angels and that of the wholemankind upon him.Allah will not accept the obligatory act of the supererogatery act (as a recompense) from him.
[3602]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone emancipates a Muslim slave, Allah will set free from Hell an organ of his body for every organ of his (slave's) body.
[3603]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace benpon him) as saying: He who emancipates a slave, Allah will set free from Hell every limb (of his body) for every limb of his (slave's) body, even his private parts.
[3604]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who emancipates a believing slave. Allah will set free from Fire his every limb for every limb of his (slave's), even his private parts for his.
[3605]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A Muslim who emancipates a Muslim (slave). Allah will save from Fire every limb of his for every limb (of the slave).Sa'id b. Marjana said: When I heard this hadith from Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him), I went away and made a mention of it to 'Ali b. Husain and he at once emancipated the slave for which Ibn ja'far was prepared to pay ten thousand dirhams or one thousand dinars.
[3606]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A son does not repay what he owes his father unless he buys him (the father) in case he is a slave and then emancipates him. In the narration transmitted by Ibn Abu Shaiba there is a slight change of words.
[3607]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters.
[3608]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (two types of transactions) Mulamasa and Munabadha
[3609]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pletsed with him) reported like this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3610]
Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a hadith like this through another chain cf transmitters.
[3611]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3612]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported : Two types of trarisactions have been forbidden (by the Holy Prophet), al-Mlulamasa and al-Munabadha. As far as Mulamasa transaction is concerned, it is that every one of them (the parties entering into transaction) should touch the garment of the other without careful consideration, and al-Munabadha is that every one of them should throw his cloth to the other and one of them should not see the cloth of his friend.
[3613]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us (from),two types of business transactions and two ways of dressing. He forbade Mulamasa and Munabadha in transactions.Mulamasa means the touching of another's garment with his hand, whether at night or by day, without turning it over except this much. Munabadha means that a man throws his garment to another and the other throws his garment, and thus confirming their contract without the inspection of mutual agreement. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab through the same chain of transmitters.
[3614]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade a transaction determined by throwing stones, and the type which involves some uncertainty.
[3615]
'Abdullah (b.'Umar) (Allah be pleased with him) said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the transaction called habal al-habala.
[3616]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the people of pre-Islamic days used to sell the meat of the slaughtered camel up to habal al-habala. And habal al-habala implies that a she-camel should give birth and then the (born one should grow young) and become pregnant. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade them that (this transaction).
[3617]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said this: One amongst you should not enter into a transaction when another is bargaining.
[3618]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person should not enter into a transaction when his brother is already making a transaction and he should not make a proposal of marriage when his brother has already made a proposal except when lie gives permission.
[3619]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A Muslim should not purchase (in opposition) to his brother. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters but with a slight change of words.
[3620]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace'be upon him) as saying: Do not go out to meet riders to enter into transaction with them; none of you must buy in opposition to another, nor must you bid against one another; a townsman must not sell for a man from the desert, and do not tie up udders of carnels and sheep, and he who buys them after that has been done has two courses open to him: after he has milked them he may keep them if he is pleased with them, or he may return them along with a sit of dates if he is displeased with them.
[3621]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the (people) meeting the caravan (for entering into business transaction with them), and the selling of goods by a townsman on behalf of a man of the desert, and seeking by a woman the divorce of her sister (from her husband), and outbidding (against one another), and tying up the udders (of animals), and buying of (things) in opposition to one's brother. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[3622]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the outbidding (against another).
[3623]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not go out to meet merchandise in the way, (wait)until it is brought into the market. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn Numair but with a slight change of words.
[3624]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of 'Ubaidullah.
[3625]
Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not meet the traders (in the way).
[3626]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) as saying: Do not meet the merchandise (in the way).
[3627]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not meet the merchant in the way and enter into business transaction with him, and whoever meets him and buys from him (and in case it is done, see) that when the owner of (merchandise) comes into the market (and finds that he has been paid less price) he has the option (to declare the transaction null and void).
[3628]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported it directly from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): The townsman'should not sell for a man from the desert (with a view to taking advantage of his ignorance of the market conditions of the city). And Zuhair reported from the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) that he forbade the townsman to sell on behalf of the man from the desert.
[3629]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The riders (carrying merchandise) should not be met in the way, and townsman should not sell for a man of the desert. The narrator reported. I said to Ibn 'Abbas: What do these words really imply-"The townsman for the man of the desert"? He said: That he should work as a broker on his behalf.
[3630]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The townsman should not sell for a man from the desert, leave the people alone, Allah will give them provision from one another. Yahya reported it with a slight change of words.
[3631]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported a similar hadith from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3632]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We were forbidden that a townsman should sell for a man of the desert, even if he is his brother or father.
[3633]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) said: We were forbidden that a townsman should sell for a man of the desert.
[3634]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be'upon him) as saying: He who bought a goat having its udder tied up should go back with it, milk it, and, if he is satisfied with its milk, he should retair it, otherwise he should return it along with a sa' of dates.
[3635]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys a goat with its udder tied up has the option to retain the goat if he so desires or return it within three days, and in case he returns it he should do so along with a sa' of dates.
[3636]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: lie who buys a goat having its udder tied up has the option to return it within three days. If he returns it he should pay a sa' of dates. Wheat is not essential.
[3637]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys a goat having its udder tied up has two courses left for him. He may retain it, and if he desires may return it along with a sa' of dates and not wheat.
[3638]
Ayyub narrated with the same chain of transmitters but with this change of words: "He who buys a goat has the option. . . ."
[3639]
Hammam b. Munabbih said: Out of the ahadith which Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported to us from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one is this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If one among you buys a she-camel having its udder tied up he has the two options for him after milking it either (to retain it) or return it with a sa' of dates.
[3640]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys foodgrain should not sell it until he has taken possession of it.
[3641]
A hadith like this has been narrated through the same chain of transmitters.
[3642]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys food-rain should not sell it until he has taken possession of it. Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said: I regard everything like food (so far as this principle is concerned).
[3643]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys foodgrain should not sell it, until he has weighed it (and then taken possession of it). I (Tawus) said to Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): Why is it so? Thereupon he said: Don't you see that they (the people) sell foodgrains against gold for the stipulated time. Abu Kuraib did not make any mention of the stipulated time.
[3644]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys foodgrain should not sell it until he has taken full possession of it.
[3645]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We used to buy foodgrains during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He (the Holy Prophet) would then send to us one who commanded us to take them (the foodgrains) to a place other than the one where we had bought them before we sold it.
[3646]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys foodgrain should not sell that before taking possession of it. He (the narrator) said: We used to buy foodgrain from the caravans in bulk, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us to re-sell that until we had shifted it to some other place.
[3647]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who bought foodgrain should not sell it until he had taken full possession of it (after measuring it).
[3648]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying,: He who bought foodgrain should not sell it until he had taken possession of it.
[3649]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that they were beaten during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) if they had bought foodgrains in bulk and then sold them in the spot without shifting them (to some other place).
[3650]
Salim b.'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported his father havingsaid this: I saw people being beaten during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in case they bought the foodgrain in bulk, and then sold them at that spot before taking it to their places. This hadith is narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah b. Abdullah b. 'Umar through another chain of transmitters (and the words are): "His father (Ibn 'Umar) used to buy foodgrains in bulk and then carried them to his people."
[3651]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who bought foodgrain should not sell it until he had measured it. In the narration of Abu Bakr there the word is Ibta' instead of Ishtara.
[3652]
Abu Huraira (Allah be please with him) is reported to have said to Marwan: Have you made lawful the transactions involving interest? Thereupon Marwan said: I have not done that. Thereupon Abu Huraira (may peace be upon him) said: You have made lawful the transactions with the help of documents only, whereas Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the transaction of foodgrains until full possession is taken of them. Marwan then addressed the people and forbade them to enter into such transactions (as are done with the help of documents). Sulaiman said: I saw the sentinels snatching (these documents) from the people.
[3653]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When you purchase foodgrains, do not sell them until you have taken possession of them.
[3654]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) is reported to have said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of a heap of dates the weight of which is unknown in accordance with the known weight of dates.
[3655]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) but with this variation that no mention is made of the dates(which one finds) at the end of the previous hadith.
[3656]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : Both parties in a business transaction have the right to annul it so long as they have not separated; except in transactions which have been made subject to the right of parties to annul them.
[3657]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) through another chain of transmitters.
[3658]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with thcm) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : When two persons enter into a transaction, each of them has the right to annul it so long as they are not separated and are together (at the place of transaction); or if one gives the other the right (to annul the transaction) But if one gives the other the option, the transaction is made on this condition (i.e. one has the right to annul the transaction), it becomes binding. And if they are separated after they have made the bargain and none of them annulled it, even then the transaction is binding.
[3659]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When two persons enter into a transac.tion, each one of them has the right to annul it so long as they are not separated, or their transaction gives one another (as a condition) the right of annulling, and if their transaction,has the right of annulling it the transaction becomes binding. Ibn Abi Umar made this addition that whenever he (Ibn Umar) entered into a transaction with a person with the intention of not breaking it, he walked a while and then returned to him.
[3660]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is no transaction between two persons entering a transaction until they separate, but only when there is an option to annul it.
[3661]
Hakim b. Hazim (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying : Both parties in a business transaction have the right to annul it so long as they have not separated; and if they speak the truth and make everything clear they will be blessed in their transaction; but if they tell a lie and conceal anything the blessing on their transaction will be blotted out.
[3662]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Hakim b. Hizam (Imam Muslim) said : Hakim b. Hizam was born inside the Ka'ba and lived for one hundred and twenty years.
[3663]
Abdullah b. Dinar narrated that he heard Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) saying : A man mentioned to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he was deceived in a business transaction, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : When you enter into a transaction, say : There should be no attempt to deceive.
[3664]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Dinar with the same chain of transmitters but these words are not found in it . "When he buys he should say: There should be no attempt to deceive."
[3665]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of fruits until they were clearly in good condition, he forbade it both to the seller and to the buyer.
[3666]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of palm-trees (i.e. their trults) until the dates began to ripen, and ears of corn until they were white and were safe from blight. He forbade the seller and the buyer.
[3667]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not buy fruit until its good condition becomes clear, and (the danger) of blight is no more. He said: Its good condition becoming clear implies that it becomes red or yellow.
[3668]
This hadith is reported or the authority of Yahya with the same chain of transmitters up to "until its good condition becomes clear," but lie did not mention what follows (these words).
[3669]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[3670]
Nafi, reported on the authority of Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) a hadith like that narrated before.
[3671]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger'(may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not buy fruits (on the trees) until their good condition becomes clear. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba it was stated that Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) was asked what good condition implied. He said: When (the danger of) blight is no more.
[3672]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (or forbade us) the sale of fruits until they are ripe in a good condition.
[3673]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding the sale of fruit until its good condition is obvious.
[3674]
Abu Bakhtari reported: I asked Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) about the sale of dates. He said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of dates of the trees until one eats them or they are eaten (i.e. they are fit to be eaten) or until they are weighed (or measured). I said: What does it imply: "Until it is weighed"? Thereupon a person who was with him (Ibn Abbas) said: Until he is able to keep it with him (after plucking them).
[3675]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not sell the fruits until their good condition becomes evident."
[3676]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbidding the sale of fruits until their good condition becomes evident and the purchase of dates for dates. Zaid b. Thabit (Allah be pleased with him) said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave a concession in case of the sale known as al-araya, there is an addition of the word an tuba'a in the hadith transmitted by Ibn Numair.
[3677]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not buy the fruit until their condition is clear, and do not buy the fresh dates. A hadith like this has been reported by Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[3678]
Sa'id b. al-Musayyib said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the transaction of Af Muzabana and Muhaqala. Muzabana means that fresh dates on the trees should be sold against dry dates. Muhaqala implies that the wheat in the ear should be sold against the wheat and getting the land on rent for the wheat (produced in it). He (the narrator) said that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) had aid: Do not sell fresh fruits on the trees until their good condition becomes manifest, and do not sell fresh dates on the trees against dry dates. Salim said: Abdullah informed me on the authority of Zaid b. Thabit, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having given concession afterwards in case of ariyya transactions by which dry dates can be exchanged with fresh dates, but he did not permit it in other cases.
[3679]
Zaid b. Thabit (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) having given concession in case of 'ariyya for selling dry dates (with) fresh dates after measuring them out.
[3680]
Zaid b. Thabit reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) give concession in case of 'ariyya transactions according to which the members of the household give dry dates according to a measure and then eat fresh dates (in exchange for it)
[3681]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Nafi' with the same chain of transmitters.
[3682]
Yahya b. Sa'id reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters but with this change: 'Ariyya implies that date-palm trees should be donated to the people and then they sell it with a measure of dry dates.
[3683]
Zaid b Thabit (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave concession in case of al-'ariyya transactions (for exchanging dates) for dates with measure. Yahya said: 'Ariyya implies that a person should buy fresh dates on the tree for his family to eat against a measure of dry dates.
[3684]
Zaid b. Thabit (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) granting concession in case of 'ariyya transactions and that implies selling of (dry dates for fresh dates) according to a measure.
[3685]
Ubaidullah reported this hadith with a slight change of words on the same authority (as quoted above).
[3686]
Nafi, reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters stating that Allah's Messengtr (may peace be upon him) granted concession in case of 'ariyya transactions (for exchange of the same commodity) with measure.
[3687]
Bashair b. Yasir reported on the authority of some of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) among the members of his family among whom one was Sahl b. Abu Hathma that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade buying of fresh dates against dry dates and that it is Riba and this is Muzabana, but he made an exemption of 'ariyya (donations) of a tree or two in which case the members of a family sell dry dates and buy fresh dates for eating them.
[3688]
Bushair b. Yasar reported on the authority of some of the Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he exempted the transactions, of 'ariyya (from the direct exchange of one kind) after measuring the dry dates (in exchange for fresh dates).
[3689]
Bushair b. Yasir reported on the authority of some of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon hinn) from among the members of his family that he forbade (the direct exchange of a commodity having different qualities) but with the change that Ishaq and Ibn al-Muthanna used the word Zabn in place ot Riba and Ibn Abu 'Umar used the word Riba (interest).
[3690]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Sahl b. Abu Hathma.
[3691]
Sahl b. Abu Hathma reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Muzabana, i.e. exchange of fresh dates with dry dates. except in case of those to whom donations of some trees have been made. It is for them that concession has been given.
[3692]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having given exemption of 'ariyya transactions measuring less than five wasqs or up to five wasqs (the narrator Dawud is in doubt whether it was five or less than five).
[3693]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Muzabana, and Muzabana implies the selling of fresh dates for dry dates by measuring them out and the selling of raisins by measure for grapes.
[3694]
'Abdullah (b. Umar) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade Muzabana, i.e. buying of fresh dates (on) the trees for dry dates by measure, and the buying of grapes for raisins by measure and the selling of field of corn for corn by measure.
[3695]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters.
[3696]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Muzabana, and Muzabana is the selling of dry dates by measure for fresh dates and the selling of raisins by measure for grapes and selling of all Ports of fruits on the basis of calculation.
[3697]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Muzabana, and Muzabana implies the selling of dry dates for fresh dates on the tree with a definite measure (making it clear) that in case it increases, it belongs to me and if it is less, it is my responsibility.
[3698]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Ayyub.
[3699]
Abdullah (b. Umar) (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Mazabana, and it implies that one should sell the fresh fruits of his orchard (for dry fruits) or, if it is fresh dates, for dry dates with a measure, or if it is grapes for raisins or if it is corn in the field for dry corn with a measure He (the Holy Prophet) in fact forbade all such transactions.Qutaiba has narrated it with a slight variation of words.This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Nafi with another chain of transmitters.
[3700]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone buys palm-trees after they have been fecundated the fruit belongs to the seller unless the buyer makes a proviso.
[3701]
Nafi reported on the authority of Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Whichever tree is bought with its roots, and if it is fecundatedits fruit would belong to one who has grafted it except when the provision is laid down by the buyer.
[3702]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Whosoever grafts the tree and then sells its roots, its fruit will belong to one who grafts it except when provision is laid down by the buyer.
[3703]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Nafi, with the same chain of transmitters.
[3704]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Massenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who buys a tree after it has been fecundated, its fruit belongs to one who sells it except when the provision has been laid down by the buyer (that it will belong to him), and he who buys a slave, his property belongs to one who sells him except when a provision has been laid down by the buyer (that it will be transferred to him with the slave).
[3705]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of al Zuhri.
[3706]
Ibn Umar reported on the authority of his father as Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying so.
[3707]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden Muhaqala. and Muzabana, Mukhibara and the sale of fruits until their good condition becomes clear, and (he commanded) that (commodities) should not be sold but for the dinar and dirham except in case of araya.
[3708]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the types of sales as described before.
[3709]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade Mukhabara and Muhaqala, and Muzabana, and the sale of the fruit until it is fit for eating, and its sale but with dirham and dinar. Exception is made in case of 'araya. Ata' said: Jabir explained (these terms) for us. As for Mukhabara it is this that a wasteland is given by a person to another and he makes an investment in it and then gets a share in the produce. According to him (Jabir), Muzabana is the sell of fresh dates on the tree for dry dates with a measure, and Muhaqala in agriculture implies that one should sell the standing crop for grains with a measure.
[3710]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding Muhaqala, and Muzabana, and Mukhabara, and the buying of date-palm until its fruit is ripened (ripening means that its colour becomes red or yellow, or it is fit for being eaten). And Muhaqala implies that crops in the field are bought for grains according to a customary measure. Muzabana implies that date-palm should be sold for dry dates by measuring them with wisqs, and al-Mukhabara is (a share), maybe one-third or one-fourth (in produce) or something like it. Zaid (one of the narrators) said to Ata' b. Abu Rabah (the other narrator): Did You bear Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) making a mention of it that he had heard it directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes.
[3711]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding Muzabana and Muhaqala, and Mukhabara, and the sale of fruits until they are ripe. I (the narrator) said to Sa'id (the other narrator): What does ripening imply? He said: It meant that they become red or become yellow and are fit for eating.
[3712]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding Muhaqala and Muzabana and Mu'awama and Mukhabara. (One of the narrators)'said: Sale years ahead is Mu'awama, and making exceptional but he made an exemption of arraya.
[3713]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). but he made no mention of transactions years (ahead) implying Mu'awama.
[3714]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade leasing of land, and selling ahead for years and selling of fruits before they become ripe.
[3715]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden the renting of land.
[3716]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who has land should cultivate it himself, but if he does not cultivate it himself, then he should let his brother cultivate it.
[3717]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported some of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had surplus of land. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He,who has surplus land (in his possession) should cultivate it, or he should lend it to his brother for benefit, but if he refuses to accept it, he should retnai it.
[3718]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden taking of rent or share of land.
[3719]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who has land should cultivate it, but if he does not find it possible to cultivate it, or finds himself helpless to do so, he should lend it to his Muslim brother, but he should not accept rent from him.
[3720]
Sulaiman b. Musa asked Ata': Did Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: "He who has land should cultivate it himself, or let his brother cultivate it, and should not give on rent"? He said: Yes.
[3721]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Mukhabara.
[3722]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: He who has surplus of land should either cultivate it himself, or let his brother cultivate it, an should not sell it. I (the narrator) said to Sa'id: What does his statement "do not sell it" mean? Does it imply "rent"? He said: Yes.
[3723]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: We used to cultivate land on rent during the lifetime of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and we got a share out of the grain left in the ears after threshing them and something unspecified. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who has land should cultivate it or let his brother till it, otherwise he should leave it.
[3724]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We used to get land (on rent) during the lifetime of Allah's Messeuge, (may peace be upon him) with a share of one-third or one-fourth (of the produce from the land irrigated) with the help of canals. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up (to address) and said: HRe who has land should cultivate it, and if he does not cultivate it, he should lend it to his brother, and if he does not lend it to his brother, he should then retain it.
[3725]
Jabir (Allah he pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who has (surplus) land should donate it (to others), or lend it. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight change of words.
[3726]
(Missing)
[3727]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding the selling (renting of) uncultivated land for two years or three.
[3728]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbidding selling of (produce) in advance for two years, and in the narmtion of Ibu Abd Shaiba (the words are) : "Selling of the fruits (on the tree) in advance for two years."
[3729]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who has land should cultivate it or lend it to his brother, but if he refuses, he should retain his land.
[3730]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding Muzabana, and Huqul. Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) said: Muzabana means the selling of fruits for dry dates and Huqul is the renting of land.
[3731]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding Muhaqala and Muzabana.
[3732]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having forbidden Mazabana and Muhaqala. Muzibana means the buying of fruits on the trees and Muhaqala is the renting of land.
[3733]
Zaid b. Amr reported: I heard Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) say: We did not see any harm in renting of the land, but as the first year was over Rafi' alleged Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having forbidden that.
[3734]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Amr b. Dinar with the same chain of transmitters but (in) the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Uyainah (the words are) : "We abandoned it (renting) on account of that."
[3735]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Rafi forbade us from benefitting from our land (in the form of rent).
[3736]
Nafi reported that Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) rented his land during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and during the caliphate of Abu Bakr and that of Umar and that of Uthman (Allah be pleased with them) and during the early period of Muawiya's caliphate until at the end of Muawiya's reign, it reached him (Ibn 'Umar) that Rafi b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) narratted (a hadith) in which (there was a decree) of prohibition by Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He (Ibn'Umar) went to him (Rafi b. Khadij) and I was with him and he asked him, whereupon he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to forbid the renting of land. So Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) abandoned it, and subsequently whenever he was asked about it, he said: Rafi b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) alleged that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade it.
[3737]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ayyub and he made an addition in the hadith narrated by Ibn Ulayya in which he said: Ibn Umar abandoned it afterwards and he did not rent it (the land).
[3738]
Nafi reported: I went to Rafi b. Khadij in the company of Ibn 'Umar (All be pleased with them) until he (Ibn 'Umar) came to him at Balat (a place near Prophet's Mosque at Medina) and he (Rafi b. Khadij) informed him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden the renting of land.
[3739]
Nafi, reported from Ibn Umar (Allah be pleated with them) that he came to Rafi and he narrated this hadith from Allah's Apostle (way peace be upon him).
[3740]
Nafi, reported that Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) used to rent the land, and that he was conveyed the hadith transmitted on the authority of Rafi b. Khadij. He (the narrator) said: He then went to him along with me. He (Rafi) narrated from some of his uncles in which it was mentioned that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade the renting of land. Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) then abandoned this practice of renting. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[3741]
Salim b. Abdullah reported that AbduUah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) used to give land on rent until (this news) reached him that Rafi b. Khadij Ansari used to forbid the renting of land. Abdullah met him and said: Ibn Khadij, what is this that you narrate from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pertaining to renting of land? Rafi b. Khadij said to Abdullah: I heard it from two uncles of mine and they had participated in the Battle of Badr who narrated to the members of the family that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the renting of land. Abdullah said: I knew it that the land was rented during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Abdullah then apprehended that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) might have said something new in this connection (in regard to prohibition of renting) which I failed to know. So he abandoned the renting of land.
[3742]
Rafi b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We used to give on rent land during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). We rented it on the share of one-third or one-fourth of the (produce) along with a definite quantity of corn. One day a person from among my uncles came to us and said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us this act which was a source of benefit to us, but the obedience to Allah and to His Messenger (may peace be upon him) is more beneficial to us. He forbade us that we should rent land with one-third or one-fourth of (the produce) and the corn of a measure, and he commanded the owner of land that he should cultivate it or let it be cultivated by other (persons) but he showed disapproval of renting it or anything besides it.
[3743]
Rafi b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We used to give land on rent, and we rented it on one-third or one-fourth share. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[3744]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Rafi' b. Khadij with the same chain of transmitters, but in it no mention is made of some of his uncles.
[3745]
Rafi (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Zuhair b. Rafi (who was his uncle) came to me and said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade a practice which was useful for us. I said: What is this? (I believe) that whatrver Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) says is absolutely true. He (Zuhair) said that he (the Holy Prophet) asked me: What do you do with your cultivable lands? I said: Allah's Messenger, we rent those irrigated by canals for dry dates or barley. He said: Don't do that. Cultivate them or let them be cultivated (by others) or retain them yourself.
[3746]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Rafi from the Prophet (may peace be upon him) about this, but he did not make mention of his uncle Zuhair.
[3747]
Hanzala b. Qais reported that he asked Rafi b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) about renting of land, whereupon he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the renting of land. I said: Is it forbidden (even if it is paid) in gold (dinar) and silver (dirham)? Thereupon he said: If it is paid in gold and silver, there is no harm in it.
[3748]
Hanzala b. Qais al-Ansri reported: I asked Rafi' b. Khadij about the renting of land for gold and silver, whereupon he said: There is no harm in it for the people let out land situated near canals and at the ends of the streamlets or portion of fields. (But it so happened) that at times this was destroyed and that was saved. whereas (on other occasions) this portion was saved and the other was destroyed and thus no rent was payable to the people (who let out lands) but for this one (which was saved). It was due to this that he (the Holy Prophet) prohibited it. But if there is something definite and reliable (e.g. money). there is no harm in it.
[3749]
Hanzala reported that he heard Rafi' b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) say: We were the major agriculturists of the Ansar and so we let out land (saying): The produce of this (part of land) would be ours and (the produce) of that would be theirs. But it so happened that at times this (land) gave harvest, but the other one produced nothing. So he (the Holy Prophet) forbade this. But so far as the payment in silver (dirham, a coin) is concerned, he did not forbid.
[3750]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[3751]
Abdullah b. al Sa'ib reported: I asked Abdullah b. Ma'qil about Muzara'a (cultivating land on share basis in the produce). He said: Thabit b. Dahhak informed me that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade Muzara'a as Ibn Abu Shaiba forbade it with a slight change of words. He (the narrator) said: I asked Ibn Ma'qil but he did not name 'Abdullah.
[3752]
Abdullah b. al-Sa'ib reported: We visited 'Abdullah b. Ma'qil and asked him about sharing of crops, whereupon he said: Thabit alleged that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade Muzara'a and commanded leasing it out on rent (for money) and said: There is no harm in it.
[3753]
Mujahid said to Tiwus: Come along with me to Ibn Rafi b. Khadij in order to listen from him the hadith transmitted on the authority of his father (pertaining to the renting of land) from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He (Tawus) scolded him and said: By Allah, it I were to know that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden it, I would have never done it. But it has been narrated to me by one who has better knowledge of it amongst them (and he meant Ibn 'Abbas) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: It is better if a person lends, his land to his brother (for cultivation) than that he gets recognised rent on it.
[3754]
Tawus reported that he let out his land on rent, whereupon Amr said: I said to him: Abu Abd al-Rahrman, I wish if you abandon this renting of land, for they alleged that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade Mukhabara. He siad: Amr, one who has informed me has the best knowledge of it among them (he meant Ibn Abbas). (He said) that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not prohibit it altogether, but said: Lending of land by one among you to his brother is better for him than getting a specified amount of produce from it.
[3755]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them).
[3756]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: If one among you lets out land to his brother, that is better for him than if he receives such and such (the definite thing). Ibn 'Abbis (Allah be pleased with them) said: It is Haql, and in the parlance of the Ansr it is Muhaqala.
[3757]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who has land, it is better for him that he should let it out to his brother.
[3758]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) contracted with the people of Khaibar the (trees) on the condition that he would have half the produce in fruits and harvest.
[3759]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) handed over the land of Khaibar (on the condition) of the share of produce of fruits and harvest, and he also gave to his wives every year one hundred wasqs: eighty wasqs of dates and twenty wasqs of barley. When 'Umar became the caliph he distributed the (lands and trees) of Khaibar, and gave option to the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to earmark for themselves the land and water or stick to the wasqs (that they got) every year. They differed in this matter. Some of them opted for land and water, and some of them opted for wasqs every year. 'A'isha and Hafsa were among those who opted for land and water.
[3760]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) contracted with the people of Khaibar (land and trees on the condition that they should give) half of the yield from land and trees. The rest of the hadith is the same. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of AIi b. Mushir there is no mention of it, but that A'isha and Hafsa were those who opted for land and water, but he (the narrator) said: He (Hadrat 'Umar, gave option to the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) that land would be earmarked for them, but he made no mention of water.
[3761]
'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that when Khaibar had been conquered, the Jews asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to let them continue (cultivation in those lands) on half of the share of yield in fruits and crop, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I will allow you to continue here, so long as we would desire. The rest of the hadith is the same, but with this addition: "The fruit would be distributed equal to the half of Khaibar. And out of hall of the produce of the land, Allah's Apostle (may peace be be upon him) got the fifth part."
[3762]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) returned to the Jews of Khaibar the date-palms of Khaibar and its land on the condition that they should work upon them with their own wealth (seeds, implements), and give half of the yield to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3763]
Ibn Umar reported that 'Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) expelled the Jews and Christians from the land of Hijaz, and that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) conquered Khaibar he made up his mind to expel the Jews from it (the territory of Khaibar) because, when that land was conquered, it came under the sway of Allah, that of His Messenger (may peace be upon him) and that of the Muslims. The jews asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to let them continue there on the condition that they would work on it, and would get in turn half of the fruit (of the trees), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : We would let you continue there so long as we will desire. So they continued (to cultivate the lands) till 'Umar externed them to Taima' ang Ariha (two villages in Arabia, but out of Hijaz).
[3764]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Never a Muslim plants a tree, but he has the reward of charity for him, for what is eaten out of that is charity; what is stolen out of that, what the beasts eat out of that, what the birds eat out of that is charity for him. (In short) none incurs a los!k to him but it becomes a charity on his part.
[3765]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited Umm Mubashshir al-Ansariya at her orchard of date-palms and said to her: Who has planted these trees of dates-a Muslim or a non-Musim ? She said : A Muslim, of course, whereupon he said: Never a Muslim plants, or cultivates a land, and it out of that men eat, or the animals eat, or anything else eats, but that becomes charity on his (planter's) behalf.
[3766]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: Never does a Muslim plant, or cultivate, but has reward for him for what the beasts eat, or the birds eat or anything else eats out of that.
[3767]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited the orchard of Umm Ma'sud and said: Umm Ma'bad. he who has planted this tree, is he a Muslim or a non-Muslim? She said: Of course, he is a Muslim, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: No Muslim who plants (trees) and from their fruits the human beings or the beasts or birds eat, but that would be taken as an act of charity on the Day of Resurrection.
[3768]
This hadith is transmitted on the authority of Abu Muawiya (but With a slight change of words).
[3769]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying Never does a Muslim plant trees or cultivate land and birds or a man or a beast eat out of them but that is a charity on his behalf.
[3770]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited the date-palms of Umm Mubashshir (Allah be pleased with her), a lady from the Ansar, and said: Who planted this palm-a Muslim or an unbelievers The rest of the hadith is the same.
[3771]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: If You sell fruits to your brother (and Jabir b. Ahduthh reported through another chain of narrators: If you were to sell fruits to your brother) and these is a stricken with Calamity, it is not permissible for you to get anything from him. Why do you get the wealth of your brother, without jutification?
[3772]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[3773]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of the fruit of date-palms until it becomes mellow. We (some of the other narrators in the chain of transmitters) said: What does the word "mellow" mean? He said: (There the fruit) turns red or yellow. Don't you see if Allah had checked (the growth of) fruits; then what for the wealth of your brother would be permissible for you?
[3774]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of fruits until these are mellow. They (the companions of Anas) said: What is meant by "mellow"? He said: It implies that these became red. He said: When Allah hinders the growth of fruits, (then) what for the wealth of your brother would become permissible for you?
[3775]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: If Allah does not fructify them, then what is permissible for one of you to take the wealth of his brother?
[3776]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) commanded to make deductions in the payment of that stricken with a Calamity.
[3777]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleeased with him) reported that in the time of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a man suffered loss in fruits he had bought and his debt increased; so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) told (the people) to give him charity and they gave him charity, but that was not enough to pay the debt in full, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to his creditors: "Take what you find, you will have nothing but alms.
[3778]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Bukair b. al-Ashajj with the same chain of transmitters.
[3779]
A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) heard the voices of altercation of two disputants at the door; both the voices were quite loud. The one demanded some remission and desired that the other one should show leniency to him, whereupon the (other one) was saying: By Allah will not do that. Then there came Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to them and said: Where is he who swears by Allah that he would not do good? He said: Massenger of Allah, it is I. He may do as he desires.
[3780]
Abdullah b. Ka'ab b. Malik reported from his father that he pressed in the mosque Ibn Abu Hadrad for the payment of the debt that he owed to him during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). (In this altercation) their voices became loud, until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) heard them, while he was in the house, so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came out towards them, and he lifted the curtain of his apartment and he called upon Ka'b b. Malik and said: O Ka'b. He said: At thy beck and call, Allah's Messenger. He pointed out with the help of his hand to remit half of the loan due to him. Ka'b said: Allah's Messenger, I am ready to do that, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said (to Ibn Abu Hadrad): Stand up and make him the payment (of the rest).
[3781]
Ka'b b. Malik reported that he made a demand for the payment of the debt that Ibn Abu Hadrad owed to him. This hadith is narrated through another chain of transmitters and (the words are): "He had to get the loan from Abdullah b. Hadrad al-Aslami. He met him and pressed him for payment. There was an altercation between them, until their voices became loud. There happened to pass by them Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he said: O Ka'b, and pointed out with his hand in such a way as he meant half. So he got half of what he (Ibn Abu Hadrad) owed to him and remitted the half."
[3782]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who found his property intact with a person (who bought it but who later on) became insolvent (or a person who became insolvent), he (the seller) is entitled to get it more than anyone else.'
[3783]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters (but with a slight variation of words and these are) "Whenever a man becomes poor."
[3784]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying about a person who becomes insolvent and (the thing bought by him) is found intact with him, that belongs to one who sold it.
[3785]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When a man becomes insolvent (and the other) man (the seller) finds his commodity intact with him, he is more entitled to get it (than anyone else)
[3786]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters (but with a change of these words): "He is more entitled to get it than any other creditor."
[3787]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : When a inan becomes insolvent, and the other person (seller) finds his goods intact with him, he is more entitled to get them than anyone else.
[3788]
Hudhaifa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying The angels took away the soul of a person who had lived among people who were before you. They (the angels) said : Did you do anything good ? He said: No. they said: Try to recall. He said : I used to lend to people and order my servants to give respite to one in straitened circumstances and give allowance to the solvent, for Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, said (to the angels) : You should ignore (his failing).
[3789]
Hudhaifa reported: A person met his Lord (after death) and He said: What (good) did you do ? He said: I did no good except this that I was a rich man, and I demanded from the people (the repayment of debt that I advanced to them). I, however, accepted that which the solvent gave and remitted (the debt) of the insolvent, whereupon He (the Lord) said: You should ignore (the faults) of My servant. Abu Mas'ud (Allah be pleased with him) said: This is what I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying.
[3790]
Hudhaifa (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person died and he entered Paradise. It was said to him What (act) did you do? (Either he recalled it himself or he was made to recall), he said I used to enter into transactions with people and I gave respite to the insolvent and did not show any strictness in case of accepting a coin or demanding cash payment. (For these acts of his) he was granted pardon. Abu Mas'ud said : I heard this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3791]
Hudhaifa (Allah be pleased with him) reported : A servant from amongst the servants of Allah was brought to Him whom Allah had endowed with riches. He (Allah) said to him: What (did you do) in the world ? (They cannot conceal anything from Allah) He (the person) said: O my Lord, You endowed me with Your riches. I used to enter into transactions with people. It was my nature to be lenient to (my debtors). I showed leniency to the solvent and gave respite to the insolvent, whereupon Allah said : I have more right than you to do this to connive at My servant. 'Uqba b. 'Amir al-Juhani and Abu Mas'ud said: This is what we heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3792]
Abu Mas'ud (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person from people who lived before you was called to account (by Allah at the Day of Judgment) and no good was found in his account except this that lie being a rich man had (financial) dealings with people and had commanded his servants to show leniency to the straitened ones. Upon this Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, said: We have more right to this, so overlook (his faults).
[3793]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : There was a person who gave loans to the people and said to his men: When an insolvent comes to you show him leniency that Allah may overlook our (faults). So when he met Allah, He overlooked his faults (forgave him).
[3794]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him).
[3795]
Abdullah b. Abu Qatida reported that Abu Qatada (Allah be pleased with him) demanded (the payment of his debt) from his debtor but he disappeared; later on he found him and he said: I am hard up financially, whereupon he said: (Do you state it) by God? He said: By God. Upon this he (Qatada) said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : He who loves that Allah saves him from the torments of the Day of Resurrection should give respite to the insolvent or remit (his debt) This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ayyob with the same chain of transmitters.
[3796]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Delay (in the payment of debt) on the part of a rich man is injustice, and when one of you is retired to a rich man, he should follow him.
[3797]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him).
[3798]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (,Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of excess water.
[3799]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the hiring of a Camel to cover a she-Camel and from selling water and land to be tilled. So from all this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade.
[3800]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Excess water must not be withheld so that the growth of herbage may be hindered.
[3801]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not withhold excess of water, so that you may prevent the growth of herbage.
[3802]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The excess of water should not be sold in order to enable the sate of herbage.
[3803]
Aba Mas'ud al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the charging of price of the dog, and earnings of a prostitute and sweets offered to a kahin.
[3804]
A hadith like this is reported on the authority of Abu Mas'ud through another chain of transmitters.
[3805]
Rafi b. Khadij (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The worst earning is the earning of a prostitute, the price of a dog and the earning of a cupper.
[3806]
Rafi b. Khadij reported Allah'& Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The price of a dog is evil, the earning of a prostitute is evil and the earning of a cupper is evil.
[3807]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Rifi' b. Khadlj through another chain of transmitters.
[3808]
Abu Zubair said: I asked Jabir about the price of a dog and a cat; he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) disapproved of that.
[3809]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) giving command for killing dogs.
[3810]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ordered to kill dogs, and he sent (men) to the corners of Medina that they should be killed.
[3811]
Abdullah (b. Umar) (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ordered the killing of dogs and we would send (men) in Medina and its corners and we did not spare any dog that we did not kill, so much so that we killed the dog that accompanied the wet she-camel belonging to the people of the desert.
[3812]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be, upon him) ordered the killing of dogs except the dog tamed for hunting, or watching of the herd of sheep or other domestic animals. It was said to Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) talks of (exception) about the dog for watching the field, whereupon he said: Since Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) possessed land.
[3813]
Abu Zubair heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ordered us to kill dogs, and we carried out this order so much so that we also kill the dog coming with a woman from the desert. Then Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade their killing. He (the Holy Prophet further) said:It is your duty the jet-black (dog) having two spots (on the eyes), for it is a devil.
[3814]
Ibn Mughaffal reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ordered the killing of dogs and then said: what is the trouble with them (the people of Medina) ? How dogs are nuisance to them (the citizens of Medina) ? He then permitted keehing of dogs for hunting and (the protection of) herds. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Yahya, he (the Holy Prophet) permitted the keeping of dogs for (the protection of) herds, for hunting and (the protection of) cultivated land.
[3815]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who keeps a dog other than that meant for watching the herd or for hunting loses every day out of his deeds equal to two qirat.
[3816]
Salim reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: He who kept a dog other than one meant for hunting or for watching the herd, lost two qirat of his reward every day.
[3817]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying He who kept a dog other than one meant for hunting or for watching the herd lost out of his deeds (equal to) two qirat every day.
[3818]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who kept a dog other than one meant for watching the herd or for hunting would lose every day two qirat of his good deeds. 'Abdullah and Abu Huraira also said: Or dog meant for watching the field.
[3819]
Salim reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who kept a dog other than one meant for hunting or for the protection of the herd would lose two qirat of his deeds every day. Salim said: Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) used to say: Or the dog meant for watching the field, and he was the owner of the land.
[3820]
Salim b. Abdullah reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Whosover amongst the owners of the house keeps a dog other than one meant for watching the herd or for hunting loses two qirat of his deeds every day.
[3821]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) narrated Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who kept a dog ther than one meant for watching the fields or herds or hunting would lose one qirat every day out of his reward (with God).
[3822]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : He who kept a dog which is neither meant for hunting nor for watching the anitmals nor for watching the fields would lose two qirat every day out of his reward; and there is no mention of the fields in the hadith transmitted by Abu Tahir.
[3823]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who kept a dog except one meant for watching the herd, or for hunting or for watching the fields. he lost two qirat of reward every day. Zuhri said: The words of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) were conveyed to Ibn Umar who said: May Allah have mercy upon Abu Huraira; he owned a field.
[3824]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who kept a dog would lose out of his deeds equal to one qirat every day. except (one kept) for watching the field or herd.
[3825]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[3826]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[3827]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who kept a dog, but not meant for hunting or watching the herd, would lose one qirat of reward every day.
[3828]
Sufyan b. Abu Zuhair (he was a person belonging to the tribe of Shanu'a and was amongst the Conpanions of Allah's Messenger [may peace be upon him ) said: I heard Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who kept a dog (other than that) which is indispensable for watching the field or the animals would lose one qirat out of his deeds every day. As-Sa'ib b Yazid (one of the narrators) said: Did you hear it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes. by the Lord of this mosque.
[3829]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyan b. Abu Zuhair al-Shana'i.
[3830]
It is narrated on the authority of Humaid that Anas b. Malik was asked about the earnings of the cupper. He said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got himself cupped. His cupper was Abu Taiba and he (the Holy Prophet) commanded to give him two sa's of corn. He (the Holy Prophet) talked with the members of his family and they lightened the burden of Kharaj (tax) from him (i.e. they made remis- sion in the charges of their own accord). He (Allah's Apostle) said: The best (treat- ment) which you take is cupping, or it is the best of your treatments.
[3831]
Rumaid reported that Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) has asked about the earnings of a cupper. Then (the above-mentioned hadith was reported but with this addition) that he said: The best treatment which you get is cupping. or aloeswood and do not torture your children by pressing their uvula.
[3832]
Humaid reported Anas (Allah be pleased with him) having said this: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) called for young cupper belonging to us. He capped him and he (the Holy Prophet) commanded that he should be paid one sa' or one mudd or two mudds (of wheat). It was said (that charges were high) and a reduction was made in the charges.
[3833]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got himself cupped and he paid the clipper his charges and he put medicine in his nostrils.
[3834]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: The slave of Banu Bayada cupped Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he gave him his wages, and talked to his master and he reduced the charges, and if this earning was unlawful Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) would not have given it.
[3835]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressing in Medina. He said: O people, Allah is giving an indication (of the prohibition) of wine. and He is probably soon going to give an order about it. So he who has anything of it with him should sell that, and derive benefit out of it. He (the narrator) said: We waited for some time that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him)said: Verily Allah, the Exalted, has forbidden wine. So who hears this verse and he has anything of it with him, he should neither drink it nor sell it. He (the narrator) said: The people then brought whatever they had of it with them on the streets of Medina and spilt that.
[3836]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Wa'ala as-Saba'i (who was an Egyptian) asked 'Abdullah b. Abbas; (Allah be pleased with them) about that which is extracted from the grapes, whereupon he said: A person presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a small water-skin of wine. Allab's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Do you know that Allah has forbidden it? He said: No. He then whisper- ed to another man. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked him what he had whispered. He said: I advised him to sell that, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Verily He Who has forbidden its drinking has forbidden its sale also. He (the narrator) said: He opened the waterskin until what was contained in it was spilt.
[3837]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Wa'ala narrated this on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Abbas.
[3838]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: When the concluding verses of Sura Baqara were revealed, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out and read them out to the people and then forbade them to trade in wine.
[3839]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: When the concluding verses of Sura Baqara pertaining to Riba were revealed, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out to the mosque and he forbade the trade in wine.
[3840]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying in the Year of Victory while he was in Mecca: Verily Allah and His Messenger have forbidden the sale of wine, carcass, swine and idols, It was said: Allah's Messenger, you see that the fat of the carcass is used for coating the boats and varnishing the hides and people use it for lighting purposes, whereupon he said: No, it is forbidden, Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: May Allah the Exalted and Majestic destroy the Jews; when Allah forbade the use of fat of the carcass for them, they melted it, and then sold it and made use of its price (received from it).
[3841]
Yazid b. Abu Habib reported: 'Ata' reported to me that he heard Jabir (b. 'Abdullah) saying it that he had heard that from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the Year of Victory.
[3842]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: This news reached 'Umar that Samura had sold wine, whereupon he said: May Allah destroy Samura; does he not know that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: "Let there be the curse of Allah upon the Jews that fat was declared forbidden for them, but they melted it and then sold it" ?
[3843]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Amr b. Dinar with the same chain of transmitters.
[3844]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: May Allah destroy the Jews for Allah forbade the use of fat for them, but they sold it and made use of its price.
[3845]
Abu Salid al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not sell gold for gold, except like for like, and don't increase something of it upon something; and don't sell silver unless like for like, and don't increase some thing of it upon something, and do not sell for ready money something to be given later.
[3846]
Nafi' reported that Ibn 'Umar told him that a person of the tribe of Laith said that Abu Sa'id al-Kludri narrated it (the above-mentioned hadith) from tile Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in a narration of Qutaiba. So 'Abduliali and Nafi' went along with him, and in the hadith transmitted by Ibn Rumh (the words are) that Nafi' said: 'Abdullah (b.'Umar) went and I along with the person belonging to Banu Laith entered (the house) of Sa'id al-Khudri, and he ('Abdullah b. Umar) said: I have been informed that you say that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of silver with silver except in case of like for like, and sale of gold for gold except in case of like for like. Abu Sa'id pointed towards this eyes and his ears with his fingers and said: My eyes saw, and my ears listened to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: Do not sell gold for gold, and do not sell silver for silver except in case of like for like, and do not increase something of it upon something, and do not sell for ready money something, not present, but hand to hand.
[3847]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id al-Khudri through another chain of transmitters.
[3848]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah'sMessenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not sell gold for gold and silver for silver weight for weight or of the same quality.
[3849]
'Uthman b. 'Affan reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)as saying: Do not sell a dinar for two dinars and one dirham for two dirhams.
[3850]
Malik b. Aus b. al-Hadathan reported: I came saying who was prepared toexchange dirhams (for my gold), whereupon Talha b. Ubaidullah (Allah be pleased with him) (as he was sitting with 'Umar b. Khattib) said: Show us your gold and then come to us (at a later time). When our servant would come we would give you your silver (dirhams due to you). Thereupon 'Umar b. al-Khattib (Allah be pleased with him) said: Not at all. By Allah, either give him his silver (coins). or return his gold to him, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Exchange of silver for gold (has an element of) interest in it. except when (it is exchanged) on the spot;and wheat for wheat is an interest unless both are handed over on the spot: barley for barley is interest unless both are handed over on the spot; dates for dates is interest unless both are handed over on the Spot.
[3851]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[3852]
Abil Qiliba reported: I was in Syria (having) a circle (of friends). in which was Muslim b. Yasir. There came Abu'l-Ash'ath. He (the narrator) said that they(the friends) called him: Abu'l-Ash'ath, Abu'l-Ash'ath, and he sat down. I said to him: Narrate to our brother the hadith of Ubada b. Samit. He said: Yes. We went out on an expedition, Mu'awiya being the leader of the people, and we gained a lot of spoils of war. And there was one silver utensil in what we took as spoils. Mu'awiya ordered a person to sell it for payment to the people (soldiers). The people made haste in getting that. The news of (this state of affairs) reached 'Ubada b. Samit, and he stood up and said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding the sale of gold by gold, and silver by silver, and wheat by wheat, and barley by barley, and dates by dates, and salt by salt, except like for like and equal for equal. So he who made an addition or who accepted an addition (committed the sin of taking)interest. So the people returned what they had got. This reached Mu'awiya. and he stood up to deliver an address. He said: What is the matter with people that they narrate from the Messenger (may peace be upon him) such tradition which we did not hear though we saw him (the Holy Prophet) and lived in his company? Thereupon, Ubida b. Samit stood up and repeated that narration, and then said: We will definitely narrate what we heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)though it may be unpleasant to Mu'awiya (or he said: Even if it is against his will). I do not mind if I do not remain in his troop in the dark night. Hammad said this or something like this.
[3853]
Ubida b. al-Simit (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: Gold is to be paid for by gold, silver by silver,wheat by wheat, barley by barley, dates by dates, and salt by salt, like for like and equal for equal, payment being made hand to hand. If these classes differ, then sell as you wish if payment is made hand to hand.
[3854]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: Gold is to be paid for by gold, silver by silver,wheat by wheat, barley by barley, dates by dates, salt by salt, like by like, payment being made hand to hand. He who made an addition to it, or asked for an addition, in fact dealt in usury. The receiver and the giver are equally guilty.
[3855]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id al-Khudri(Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3856]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: Dates are to be paid for by dates, wheat by wheat,barley by barley, salt by salt, like for like, payment being made on the spot. He who made an addition or demanded an addition, in fact, dealt in usury except in case where their classes differ. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Fudail b.Ghazwan with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention of (payment being) made on the spot.
[3857]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Mess-.,nger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Gold is to be paid for by gold with equal weight, like for like, and silver is to be paid for by silver with equal weight, like for like. He who made an addition to it or demanded an addition dealt in usury.
[3858]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Let dinar be exchanged for dinar, with no addition on either side and dirham be exchanged for dirham with no addition on either side. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Musa b. Abu Tamim with the same chain of transmitters.
[3859]
Abu Minhal reported: My partner sold silver to be paid in the (Hajj)season or (in the days of) Hajj. He (my partner) came to me and informed me, and I said to him: Such transaction is not desirable. He said: I sold it in the market (on loan) but nobody objected to this. I went to al-Bara' b. 'Azib and asked him, and he said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to Medina and we made such transaction, whereupon he said: In case the payment is made on the spot, there is no harm in it, and in case (it is 'sold) on loan, it is usury. You better go to Zaid b.Arqam, for he is a greater trader than I; so I went to him and asked him, and he said like it.
[3860]
Habib reported that he heard Abu Minhal as saying: I asked al-Bara' b.Azib about the exchange of (gold for silver or vice versa), whereupon he said: you better ask Zaid b. Arqam for he knows more than I. So I asked Zaid but he said: You better ask al-Bara' for he knows more than I. Then both of them said: Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of silver for gold when payment is to be made in future.
[3861]
Abd al-Rabman b. Abia Bakra reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the sale of gold for gold, and silver for silver except equal for equal, and commanded us to buy silver for gold as we desired and buy gold for silver as we desired. A person asked him (about the nature of payment), whereupon he said: It is to be made on the spot. This is what I heard(from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him ).
[3862]
Abd al-Rabman b. Abu Bakra said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited us. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[3863]
Fadala b. Ubaid al-Ansari reported: A necklace having gold and gems in it was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in Khaibar and it was one of the spoils of war and was put to sale. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The gold used in it should be separated, and then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) further said : (Sell) gold for gold with equal weight.
[3864]
Fadila b. 'Ubaid (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I bought on the day (of the Victory of Khaibar) a necklace for twelve dinars (gold coins).It was made of gold studded with gems. I separated (gold from gems) in it,and found (gold) of more (worth) than twelve dinars. I made a mention of it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: It should not be sold unless it is separated.
[3865]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Sa'id b. Yazid with the same chain of transmitters.
[3866]
Fadala b. 'Ubaid reported: We were in the company of Allah's Messenger ( may peace be upon him) on the day (of the Victory of) Khaibar, and made transaction with the Jews for the 'uqiya of gold for the dinars or three (gold coins), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do not sell gold for gold but for equal weight
[3867]
Hanash reported: We were along with Fadala b. Ubaid (Allah be pleased with him)in an expedition. There fell to my and my friend's lot a necklace made of gold, silver and jewels. I decided to buy that. I asked Fadala b. 'Ubaid, whereupon he said: Separate its gold and place it in one pan (of the balance) and place your gold in the other pan, and do not receive but equal for equal, for I heard Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: He who believes in Allah and the Hereafter should not take but equal for equal.
[3868]
Ma'mar b. Abdullah reported that he sent his slave with a sa' of wheat and said to him: Sell it, and then buy with it barley. The slave went away and he got a sa' (of barley) and a part of sa' over and above that. When he came to Ma'mar he informed him about that, whereupon Ma'mar said to him: Why did you do that? Go back and return that, and do not accept but weight, for weight, for I used to hear from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Wheat for wheat and like for like. He (one of the narrators) said: Our food in those days consisted of barley.It was said to him (Ma'mar) that (wheat) is not like that (barley). He replied: I am afraid these may not be similar
[3869]
Abu Huraira and Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) deputed a person from Banu 'Adi al-Ansari to collect revenue from Khaibar. He came with a fine quality of dates, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Are all the dates of Khaibar like this? He said: Allah's Messenger, it is not so. We buy one sa' of (fine quality of dates) for two sa's out of total output (including even the inferior quality of dates), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Don't do that, but like for like, or sell this (the inferior quality and receive the price) and then buy with the price of that, and that would make up the measure.
[3870]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) deputed a person to collect revenue from Khaibar. He brought fine quality of dates, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Are all the dates of Khaibar like this)? He said: No. We got one sa' (of fine dates) for two sa's (of inferior dates), and (similarly) two sa's for three sa's. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Don't do that rather sell the inferior quality of dates for dirhams (money), and then buy the superior quality with the help of dirhams.
[3871]
Abd Sa'id reported: Bilal (Allah be pleased with him) came with fine quality of dates. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: From where (you have brought them)? Bilal said: We had inferior quality of dates and I exchanged two sa's (of inferior quality) with one sa (of fine quality) as food for Allah's Apostle(may peace be upon him), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Woe! it is in fact usury; therefore, don't do that. But when you intend to buy dates(of superior quality), sell (the inferior quality) in a separate bargain and then buy (the superior quality). And in the hadith transmitted by Ibn Sahl there is no mention of "whereupon".
[3872]
Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Dates were brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he said: These dates are not like our dates, whereupon a man said: We sold two sa's of our dates (in order to get) one sa', of these (fine dates), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: That is interest; so return (these dates of fine quality), and get your (inferior dates) ; then sell our dates (for money) and buy for us (with the help of money) such (fine dates).
[3873]
Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We were given to eat, during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), dates of different qualities mixed together, and we used to sell two sa's of these for one sa, (of fine quality of dates). This reached Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: There should be no exchange of two sa's of (inferior) dates for one sa (of fine dates) and two sa's of (inferior) wheat for one sa' of (fine) wheat. and one dirham for two dirharms.
[3874]
Abu Nadra reported: I asked Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) about the conversion (of gold and silver for silver and gold). We said: Is it hand to hand exchange? I said: Yes. whereupon he said: There is no harm in it. I informed Abu Sa'id about it, telling him that I had asked Ibn 'Abbas about it and he said: Is it hand to hand exchange? I said: Yes, whereupon he said: There is no harm in it. He(the narrator) said, or he said like it: We will soon write to him, and he will not give you this fatwa (religious verdict). He said: By Allah, someone of the boy-servants of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) brought dates, but he refused to accept them (on the plea) that those did not seem to be of the dates of our land. He said: Something had happened to the dates of our land, or our dates. So I got these dates (in exchange by giving) excess (of the dates of our land), whereupon he said: You made an addition for getting the fine dates (in exchange) which tantamounts, to interest; don't do that (in future). Whenever you find some doubt (as regards the deteriorating quality of) your dates, sell them, and then buy the dates that you like.
[3875]
Abu Nadra reported: I asked Ibn Umar and Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) about the conversion of gold with gold but they did not find any harm in that. I was sitting in the company of Abd Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) and asked him about this exchange, and he said: Whatever is addition is an' interest. I refused to accept it on account of their statement (statement of Ibn 'Abbas and Ibn 'Umar). He said: I am not narrating to you except what I heard from Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him). There came to him the owner of a date-palm with one sa' of fine dates, and the dates of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) were of that colour.Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to him: Where did you get these dates? I went with two sa's of (inferior dates) and bought one sa' of (these fine dates), for that is the prevailing price (of inferior dates) in the market and that is the price (of the fine quality of dates in the market), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Woe be upon you! You have dealt in interest, when you decide to do it (i.e. exchange superior quality of dates for inferior quality); so you should sell your dates for another commodity (or currency) and then with the help of that commodity buy the dates you like. Abu Sa'ad said: When dates are exchanged for dates (with different qualities) there is the possibility (of the element of) interest (creeping into that) or when gold is exchanged for gold having different qualities. I subsequently came to Ibn 'Umar and he forbade me (to do it), but I did not come to Ibn 'Abbas; (Allah be pleased with them). He (the narrator) said: Abu as-Sahba' narrated to me:He asked Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) in Mecca, and he too disapproved of it.
[3876]
Abu Salih reported: I heard Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) said: Dinar (gold) for gold and dirham for dirham can be (exchanged) with equal for equal; but he who gives more or demands more in fact deals in interest. I sald to him: Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) says otherwise, whereupon he said: I met Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) and said: Do you see what you say ; have you heard it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), or found it in the Book of Allah, the Glorious and Majestic? He said: I did not hear it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). and I did not find it in the Book of Allah (Glorious and Majestic), but Usama b. Zaid narrated it to me that Allah's Apostle(may peace be upon him) said: There can be an element of interest in credit.
[3877]
Ubaidullah b. Abu Yazid heard Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) as saying: Usama b. Zaid reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: There can be an element of interest in credit (when the payment is not equal).
[3878]
Ibn 'Abbas; (Allah be pleased with them) reported on the authority of Usama b. Zaid Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said this: There is no element of interest when the money or commodity is exchanged hand to hand.
[3879]
Ata' b. Abu Rabah reported: Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with them) met Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) and said to him: What do you say in regard to the conversion (of commodities or money) did you hear it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), or is it something which you found In Allah's Book, Majestic and Glorious? Thereupon Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleated with them) said: I don't say that. So far at Allah's Massenger (may peace be upon him) is concerned, you know him better, and to far as the Book of Allah to concerned, I do not know it (more than you do), but 'Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) narrated to me Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said this: Beware, there can be an element of interest in credit.
[3880]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) (Allah be pleased with him) said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cursed the one who accepted interest and the one who paid it I asked about the one who recorded it, and two witnesses to it. He(the narrator) said: We narrate what we have heard.
[3881]
Jabir said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cursed the accepter of interest and its payer, and one who records it, and the two witnesses, and he said: They are all equal.
[3882]
Nu'man b. Bashir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon himn) as having said this (and Nu'man) pointed towards his ears with his fingers): What is lawful is evident and what is unlawful is evident, and in between them are the things doubtful which many people do not know. So he who guards against doubtful things keeps his religion and honour blameless, and he who indulges in doubtful things indulges in fact in unlawful things, just as a shepherd who pastures his animals round a preserve will soon pasture them in it. Beware, every king has a preserve, and the things God his declaced unlawful are His preserves. Beware, in the body there is a piece of flesh ; if it is sound, the whole body is sound and if it is corrupt the whole body is corrupt, and hearken it is the heart.
[3883]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zakariya with the same chain of transmitters.
[3884]
AI-Nu'man b. Bashir reported it from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). The hadith narrated by Zakariya is, however, more complete and lengthy than the other ones.
[3885]
Nu'man b. Bashir b. Sa'd, a Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was heard delivering a sermon at Hims and was saying: I heard Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: The lawful is evident and the unlawful is evident , the rest of the hadith is the same as related by Zakariya.
[3886]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he was travelling on his camel which had grown jaded, and he decided to let it off. When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) met him and prayed for him and struck it, so it trotted as it had never trotted before. He said: Sell it to me for an 'uqaya. I said: No. He again said: Sell it to me. So I sold it to him for an 'uqaya, but made the stipulation that I should be allowed to ride back to my family. Then when I came to (my place) I took the camel to him and he paid me its price in ready money. I then went back and he sent :(someone) behind me (and as I came) he said: Do you see that I asked you to reduce price for buying your camel. Take your camel and your coins; these are yours.
[3887]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters.
[3888]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I went on an expedition with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He overtook me and I was on a water-carrying camel who had grown tired and did not walk (trot). He (the Holy Prophet) said to me: What is the matter with your camel ? I said: It is sick. He (the Holy Prophet) stepped behind and drove it and prayed for it, and then it always moved ahead of other camels. He (then) said: How do you find your camel? I said: It is, by the grace of your prayer, all right. He said: Would you sell this (camel) to me? I felt shy (to say him, "No") as we had no other camel for carrying water, but (later on) I said: Yes, and to I sold it to him on the condition that (I would be permitted) to ride it until I reached Madina. I said to him: Allah's Messenger,I am newly married, so I asked his permission (to go ahead of the caravan). He permitted me, and I reached Medina well in advance of other people, until I reached my destination. There my maternal uncle met me and asked me about the camel, and I told him what I had done with regard to it. He reproved me in this connection. He (Jabir) said: When I asked his permission (to go ahead of the caravan) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) inquired of me whether I had married a virgin or a non-virgin. I said to him: I have married a non-virgin. He said: Why did you not marry a virgin who would have played with you and you would have played with her? I said to him: Allah's Messenger, my father died (or he fell as a martyr), and I have small sisters to (look after), so I did not like the idea that I should marry a woman who is like them and thus be not able to teach them manners and look after them properly. So I have married a non-virgin so that she should be able to look after them and teach them manners, When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Medina, I went to him in the morning with the camel. He paid me its price and returned that (the camel) to me.
[3889]
Jabir reported: We went from Mecca to Medina with Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) when my camel fell ill, and the rest of the hadith is the same. (But it in also narrated in it:) He (the Holy Prophet) said to me: Sell your camel to me. I said: No, but it is yours. He said: No. (it can't be), but sell it to me.I said: No, but, Allah's Messenger, it is yours. He said: No, it can't be, but sell it to me. I said: Then give me an 'uqaya of gold for I owe that to a person and then it would be yours. He (the Holy Prophet) said: I take it (for an 'uqiya of gold) and you reach Medina on it. As I reached Medina, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)said to Bilal: Give him an 'uqiya of gold and make some extra payment too. He (Jabir) said: He gave me an 'uqiya of gold and made an addition of a qirat. He (Jabir) said: The addition made by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was with me (as a sacred trust for belssing) and lay with me in a pocket until the people of Syria took it on the Day of Harra.
[3890]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We were with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in a journey and my camel meant for carrying water lagged behind. The rest of the hadith is the same and it is mentioned also:Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pricked it and then said to me: Ride in the name of Allah. He constantly made addition (in prayers for me) and went on saying.May Allah forgive you!
[3891]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: My camel had grown tired as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to me. He goaded it and it began to jump. After that I tried to restrain its rein so that I could listen to his (Prophet's) words, but I could not do that. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) met me and said: Sell it to me, and I sold it for five 'uqiyas. I said: On the condition that I may use it as a ride (for going back) to Medina. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Well, you may use it as a ride up till Medina. When I came to Medina I handed over that to him and he made an addition of an uqiya (to that amount which had been agreed upon) and then presented that (camel) to me.
[3892]
Abd Mutawakkil al-Najl reported from Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) who said: I accompanied Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in one of his journeys (the narrator says, he said in Jihad), and he narrated the rest of the hadith, and made this addition: He (the Holy Prophet) said: Jabir, have you received the price? I said: Yes, whereupon he said: Yours is the price as well as the camel ; yours is the price as well as the camel.
[3893]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) bought a camel from me for two 'uqiyas and a dirham or two dirhams. As he reached Sirar (a village near Medina), he commanded a cow to be slaughtered and it was slaughtered, and they ate of that, and as he (the Holy Prophet) reached Medina he ordered me to go to the mosque and offer two rak'ahs of prayer, and he measured for me the price of the camel and even made an excess payment to me.
[3894]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported this narration from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) but with this variation that he said: He (the Holy Prophet) bought the camel from me on a stipulated price. And he did not mention two 'uqiyas and a dirham or two dirhams, and he comanded a cow (to be slaughtered) and it was slaughtered, and he then distributed its flesh.
[3895]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to him: I have taken your camelfor four dinars, and you may ride upon it to Medina.
[3896]
Abu Rafi' reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took from a man as a loan a young camel (below six years). Then the camels of Sadaqa were brought to him. He ordered Abu Rafi' to return to that person the young camel (as a return of the loan). Abu Rafi' returned to him and said: I did not find among them but better camels above the age of six. He (the Holy Propet) said: Give that to him for the best men are those who are best in paying off the debt.
[3897]
Abu Rafi', the freed slave of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took as a loan (the rest of the hadith is the same), but with this variation that he (the Holy Prophet) said: Good amongst the servants of Allah is he who is best in paying off the debt.
[3898]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) owed (something) to a person. He behaved in an uncivil manner with him. This vexed the Companions of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him), whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: He who has a right is entitled to speak, and said to them (his Companions): Buy a camel for him and give that to him. They said: We do not find a camel (of that age) but one with better age than that. He said: Buy that and give that to him, for best of you or best amongst you are those who are best in paying off debt.
[3899]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took a camel on loan, and then returned him (the lender) the camel of a more mature age and said: Good among you are those who are good in clearing off the debt.
[3900]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: There came a person demanding a camel from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He (the Holy Prophet) said: Give him (the camel) of that age or of more mature age, and said: Best among you is one who is best in clearing off the debt.
[3901]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: There came a slave and pledg- ed allegiance to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) on migration; he (the Holy Prophet) did not know that he was a slave. Then there came his master and demanded him back, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Sell him to me. And he bought him for two black slaves, and he did not afterwards take allegiance from anyone until he had asked him whether he was a slave (or a free man)
[3902]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) bought some grain from a Jew on credit and gave him a coat-of- mail of his as a pledge.
[3903]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) bought from a Jew grain (as loan) and pledged him his iron coat-of-mail.
[3904]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) bought from a Jew grain for a specified time; and gave him iron coat-of-mail of his as a pledge.
[3905]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her), through another chain ol transmitters, but no mention was made of (its being made) of iron.
[3906]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that when Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) came to Medina, they were paying one and two years in advance for fruits, so he said: Those who pay in advance for anything must do so for a specified weight and for a definite time.
[3907]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to (Medina) and the people were paying in advance (for the fruits, etc.), he said to them: He who makes an advance payment should not make advance payment except for a specified measure and weight (and for a specified period).
[3908]
Ibn Abu Najih has narrated a hadith like this with the same chain of transmitters, but he has not mentioned: "for a definite period".
[3909]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Abu Najih through another chain of transmitters mentioning in it "for a specified period".
[3910]
Ma'mar (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who hoards is a sinner. It was said to Sa'id (b. al-Musayyib):You also hoard. Sa'id said: Ma'mar who narrated this badith also hoarded.
[3911]
Ma'mar b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No one hoards but the sinner.
[3912]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Sulaiman b. Bilal from Yahya.
[3913]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) said he heard Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: Swearing produces a ready sale for a commodity, but blots out the blessing.
[3914]
Abu Qatada al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) reported he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Beware of swearing; it produces a ready sale for a commodity, but blots out the blessing.
[3915]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: He who has a partner in a dwelling or a garden, it is not lawful for him to sell that until he is permitted by his partner. If he (the partner) agrees, he should go in for that, and if he disapproves of that, he should abandon(the idea of selling it).
[3916]
Jabir bin 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) decreed pre-emption in every joint ownership and not divided-the one-it may be a dwelling or a garden. It is not lawful for him(for the partner) to sell that until his partner gives his consent. He (the partner) is entitled to buy it when he desires and he can abandon it if he so likes. And if he (the one partner) sells it without getting the consent of the (other partner), he has the greatest right to it.
[3917]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: There is pre-emption in everything which is shared, be it land, or a dwelling or a garden. It is not proper to sell it until he informs his partner; he may go in for that, or he may abandon it; and it he (the partner intending to sell his share) does not do that, then his partner has the greatest right to it until he permits him.
[3918]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None among you should prevent his neighbour from fixing a beam in his wall. Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) then said: What is this that I see you evading (this injunction of the Holy Prophet) ? By Allah, I will certainly throw it between your shoulders (narrate this to you.)
[3919]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transrmitters.
[3920]
Sa'id b. Zaid b. 'Amr b. Nufail (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who wrongly took a span of land, Allah shall make him carry around his neck seven earths.
[3921]
Sa'id b. Zaid b. 'Amr b. Nufail (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Arwi (bint Uwais) disputed with him (in regard to a part of the land) of his hodse. He said: Leave it and take off your claim from it, for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who took a span of land without his right would be made to wear around his neck seven earths on the Day of Resurrection. He (Sa'id b. Zaid) said: O Allah, make her blind if she has told a lie and make her grave in her house. He (the narrator) said: I saw her blind groping (her way) by touching the walls and saying: The curse of Sa'id b. Zaid has hit me. And it so happened that as she was walking in her house, she passed by a well in her house and fell therein and that be- came her grave.
[3922]
Hisham b. Urwa reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that Arwa bint Uwais disputed with Sa'id b. Zaid that he had seized some of the land belonging to her. She brought this dispute before Marwan b. al-Hakam. Sa'id said: How could I take a part of her land, after what I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon'him)? He (Marwan) said: What did you hear from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ? He said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: He who wrongly took a span of land would be made to wear around his neck seven earths. Marwan said: I do not ask any evidence from you after this. He (Sa'id) said: O Allah, make her blind if she has told a lie and kill her in her own land. He (the narrator) said: She did not die until she had lost her eyesight, and (one day) as she was walking in her land, she fell down into a pit and died.
[3923]
Sa'id b. Zaid reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) say: He who took a span of earth wrongly would be made to wear around his neck seven earths on the Day of Resurrection.
[3924]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) as saying: One should not take a span of land without having legitimate right to it, otherwise Allah would make him wear (around his neck) seven earths on the Day of Resurrection.
[3925]
Muhammad b. Ibrahim said that Abu Salama reported to him that there was between him and his people dispute over a piece of land, and he came to 'A'isha and mentioned that to her, whereupon she said: Abu Salama, abstain from getting this land, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who usurps even a span of land would be made to wear around his neck seven earths.
[3926]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Salama with another chain of transmitters.
[3927]
Abu Haraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When you disagree about a path, its breadth should be made seven cubitS.
[3928]
Usama b. Zaid reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A Muslim is not entitled to inherit from a non-Muslim, and a non-Muslim is not entitled to inherit from a Muslim.
[3929]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Give the shares to those who are entitled to them, and what remains over goes to the nearest male heir.
[3930]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Give the shares to those who are entitled to them, and what is left from those wno are entitled to it goes to the nearest male heir.
[3931]
Tawus reported on the authority of his father Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) narrating that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Distribute the property amongst Ahl al-Fara'id, according to the Book of Allah, and what is left out of them goes to the nearest male heir.
[3932]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I fell sick and there came to me on foot Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr for inquiring after my health. I fainted. He (the Holy Prophet) performed ablution and then sprinkled over me the water of his ablution. I felt some relief and said: Allah's Messenger, how should I decide about my property? He said nothing to me in response until this verse pertaining to the law of inheritance was revealed: "They ask you for a decision ; say: Allah gives you a decision concerning the person who has neither parents nor children" (iv. 177).
[3933]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Apostle(may peace be upon him) and Abi Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) visited me on foot in Banu Salama, and found me unconscious. He (the Holy Prophet) called for water and performed ablution and sprinkled out of it (the water) over me. I felt relieved. I said: Allah's Messenger, what should I do with my property? And this verse was revealed: "Allah enjoins you concerning your children: for the male is equal of the portion of two females."
[3934]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: While I had been ill Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited me and Abu akr (Allah be pleased with him) was with him, and they both came walking on foot. He (the Holy Prophet) found me unconscious. Allahs Messenger (may peace be upon him) performed ablution and then sprinkled over me the water of his ablution. I felt relieved regained my consciousness) and found Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) there. I said:Allah's Messenger, what should I do with my property ? He gave me no reply until the verse (iv. 177) relating to the law of inheritance was revealed.
[3935]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him)reported: Whilo I was ill Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to me and found me unconscious. He(the Holy Prophet) performed ablution, and sprinkled over me the water of his ablution. I regained my consciousness and said: Allah's Messenger, my case of inheritance is that of Kalala. Then the verse pertaining to the inheritance ( of Kalala) was revealed. I (one of the narrators) said: I said to Muhammad b. Munkadir: (Do you mean this verse) "They ask you ; say: Allah gives you decision in regard to Kalala" (iv. 177) ? He said: Yes, it was thus revealed.
[3936]
This hadith is transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba but with a slight variation of words.
[3937]
Abu Talha reported: 'Umar b. al-Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) delivered a sermon on Friday and made a mention of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he also made a mention of Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) and then said: I do not leave behind me any problem more difficult than that of Kalala. I did not refer to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) more repeatedly than in case of the problem of Kalala, and he (the Holy Prophet) never showed more annoyance to me than in regard to this problem, so much so that he struck my chest with his fingers and said: 'Umar, does the verse revealed in summer season, at the end of Sura al-Nisa' not suffice you ? Hadrat 'Umar (then) said : If I live I would give such verdict about (Kalala) that everyone would be able to decide whether he reads the Qur'an or he does not.
[3938]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[3939]
Al-Bara' (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the last verse revealed in the Holy Qur'an is: "They ask thee for a religious verdict; say: Allah gives you a religious verdict about Kalala (the person who has neither parents nor children)"(iv 177).
[3940]
Abu Ishaq said that he heard al-Bara' b. 'Azib (Allah be pleased with him say: The last verse revealed (in the Holy Quran) is that pertaining to Kalala, and the last sura revealed is Sura al-Bara'at.
[3941]
Abu Ishaq said that he heard al-Bara' b. 'Azib (Allah be pleased with him)say : The last complete sura revealed (in the Holy Qur'an) is Sura Tauba (i e. al-Bara'at, ix.), and the last verse revealed is that pertaining to Kalala.
[3942]
Aba Ishaq reported this hadith on the authority of al-Bara' (Allah be pleased with him) with a slight variation of words, viz. the last sura that was revealed complete.
[3943]
Al-Bara' (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the last verse revealed was: "They ask of thee religious verdict . . " (iv. 177).
[3944]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that when the body of a dead person having burden of debt upon him was brought to Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) he would ask whether he had left property enough to clear off his debt, and if the property left had been sufficient for that (purpose), he observed funeral prayer for him, otherwise he said (to his companions): You observe prayer for your companion. But when Allah opened the gateways of victory for him, he said: I am nearer to the believers than themselves, so if anyone dies leaving a debt, its payment is my responsibility, and if anyone leaves a property, it goes to his heirs.
[3945]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of al-Zuhri through another chain of transmitters.
[3946]
Abn Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said this: By Him in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, there is no believer on the earth with whom I am not the nearest among all the people. He who amongst you (dies) and leaves a debt, I am there to pay it, and he who amongst you (dies) leaving behind children I am there to look after them. And he who amongst You leaves behind property, that is for the inheritor whoever he is.
[3947]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: This is what Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) narratted to us from Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him). And he narrated many ahadith, and one was this: Allali's Messenger (may peace be upon him said: I am, according to the Book of Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, nearest to the believers of all the human beings. So whoever amongst you dies in debt or leaves behind destitute children, you should call me (for help)), for I am his guardian. And who amongst you leaves property, his inheritor is entitled to get it, whoever he is.
[3948]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying : He who leaves property, that is for the inheritors; and he who leaves behind destitute children, then it is my responsibility (to look after them).This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[3949]
Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I donated a pedigree horse in the path of Allah. Its possesser made it languish. I thought that he would sell it at a cheap price. I asked Allah's Menengsr (may peace be upon him) about it, whereupon he said: Don't buy it and do not get back your charity, for one who gets back the charity is like a dog who swallows its vomit. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Malik b. Anas with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "Don't buy that even if he gives you for one dirham."
[3950]
Zaid b. Aslam reported on the authority of his father that 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) donated a horse in the path of Allah. He found that it had languished in the hand of its possessor, and he was a man of meagre resources He (Hadrat 'Umar) intended to buy it. He came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and made a mention of that to him, whereupon he said: Don't buy that even if you get it for a dirham for he who gets back the charity is like a dog which swallows its vomit.
[3951]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters but with this (change) that the hadith transmitted on the authority of Malik and Rauh (he was the son of Qisirn) is more complete and lengthy.
[3952]
Ibn 'Umar reported that 'Umar b. al-Khattib (Allah be pleased with him) donated a horse in the path of Allah and (later on) he found it being sold, and he decided to buy that. He asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about it. whereupon he (the Holy prophet) said: Don't buy that and do not get back what you gave in charity.
[3953]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[3954]
Salim reported from Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) that 'Umar donated a horse in the path of Allah and then found it being sold, and he decided to buy that. He asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about it, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Umar, do not get back what you gave as charity.
[3955]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said this: He who gets back his charity is like a dog which vomit, and then returns to that and eats it.
[3956]
A hadith like this is reported on the authority of Muhammad son of Fatima (Allah be pleased with her) daughter of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3957]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: The similitude of one who gives a charity and then gets it back is like that of a dog which vomits and then eats its vomit.
[3958]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: One who gets back the gift is like one who eats vomit.
[3959]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[3960]
Abdullah b. Tawus reported on the authority of his father who reported from Ibn Abas(Allah be pleased with them) who reported from Allah's Messenger 'may peace be upon him) that he said: One who gets back his gift is like a dog which vomits and then swallows that vomit.
[3961]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported that his father brought him to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I have donated this slave of mine to my son. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Have you donated to every one of your sons (a slave) like this? He said: No. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) said: Then take him back.
[3962]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported: My father brought me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I have donated this slave to my son. whereupon he said: Have you made (such) donation to every one or your sons? He said: No. Thereupon he (the-Holy Prophet) said: Then take him back.
[3963]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zubri with different chains of transmitters and a slight variation of words.
[3964]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported that his father had donated a slave to him. Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) said: Who is this slave (how have you come to possess it)? Thereupon he (Nu'man b. Bashir) said: My father has donated it to me, whereupon he said: Have all brothers (of yours) been given this gift as given to you? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Then return him.
[3965]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported: My father donated to me some of his property. My mother Amra bint Rawaha said: I shall not be pleased (with this act) until you make Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a witness to it. My father went to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in order to make him the witness of the donation given to me. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Have you done the same with every son of yours? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Fear Allah, and observe equity in case of your children. My father returned and got back the gift.
[3966]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported that his mother bint Rawaha asked his (Nu'man's) father about donating some gifts from his property to his son. He deferred the matter by one year, and then set forth to do that. She (Nu'man's mother) said : I shall not be pleased unless you call Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as witness to what you confer as a gift on your son. (Nu'man said): So father took hold of my hand and I was at that time a boy, and came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). and said: Allah's Messenger, the mother of this son (of mine), daughter of Rawaha wishes that I should call you witness to what I confer as gift to her son. Allah's Messenger (may pease be upon him) said: Bashir, have you any other son besides this (son of yours)? He said : Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) said : Have you given gifts to all of them like this? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Then call me not as witness, for I cannot be witness to an injustice.
[3967]
Nu'man b. Bashir, reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: Have you, besides him, other sons? He said: Yes. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Have you given gifts to all of them like this (as you have given to Nu'man)? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: I cannot bear witness to an injustice.
[3968]
Nu'man b. Bashir (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to his father: Call me not as witness to an injustice.
[3969]
Nu'man b. Bashir (Allah be pleased with them) reported: My father took me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, bear witness that I have given such and such gift to Nu'man from my property, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Have you conferred upon all of your sons as you have conferred upon Nu'man? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Call someone else besides me as a witness. And he further said: Would it, please you that they (your children) should all behave virtuously towards you ? He said: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Then don't do that (i e. don't give gift to one to the exclusion of others).
[3970]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported: My father conferred a gift upon me, and then brought me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to make him a witness (to it). He (the Holy Prophet) said: Have you given such gift to every son of yours (as you have given to Nu'man)? He said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Don't you expect goodness from them as you expect from him? He said: Yes. of course. He (the Holy Prophet) said: I am not going to bear witness to it (as it is injustice). Ibn Aun (one of the narrators) said: I narrated this hadith to Muhammad (the other narrator) who said: Verily we narrated that lie (the Holy Prophet) had said: Observe equity amongst your children.
[3971]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the wife of Bashir said (to her husband): Give to my son your slave as a gift, and make for me Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a witness He came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: The daughter of so and so (his wife Amra bint Rawaha) asked me to give my slave as a gift to her son, and call for me Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as a witness. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Has he (Nu'man) brothers? He (Bashir) said: Yes. He (further) said: Have you given to all others as you have given to him? He said: No. He said: Then it is not fair; and verily I cannot bear witness but only to what is just.
[3972]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Whoever a person is gifted a life grant, then it is for him (belongs to him and to his posterity, for it belongs to him who has been gven it). It would not return to him who gave it for he conferred it as a gift (it becomes the property of the donee and as such) rules of inheritance will apply to it.
[3973]
Jaber b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upan him) as saying: He who conferred a life grant upon a person, it becomes his possession and that of his successors, for he surrendered his right in that by his declaration. (This property) now belongs to one to whom this lifelong grant has been made, and to his successors. Yahya narrated in the beginning of his narration: Whatever man is given a life grant, then it belongs to him and his posterity.
[3974]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Whoever a person conferred Umra (life grant) upon a person and he says: I confer upon you this and upon your descendants and anyone who survives you, and that becomes his possession and that of his posterity. It would become (a permanent possession) of those who were conferred upon this gift, and it would not return to its owner (donor), for he gave that as a gift in which accrued the right of inheritance.
[3975]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) said: The Umra for which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave sanction that a person way say: This (property) is for you and for your descendants. And when he said: That is for you as long as you live, then it will return to its owner (after the death of the donee). Ma'mar said: Zuhri used to give religious verdict according to this.
[3976]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that whoever is conferred upon a life grant along with his descendants is entitled to make use of the property conferred so long as he lives and his successors (also enjoy this privilege). That (property) becomes the their defect belonging. The donor cannot (after declaring Umra) lay down any condition or make any exception. Abu Salama said: For he conferred a grant and as such it becomes heritage. and the right of inheritance abrogated his condition.
[3977]
Jabir (b. 'Abdullah) (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Life grant is for one upon whom it is bestowed.
[3978]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported a hadith like this through another chain of transmitters.
[3979]
Jabir reported this hadith directly from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him)
[3980]
Jabir (b. 'Abdullah) (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Keep your property to yourselves and do not squander it, for he who conferred a life grant upon another that property will belong to him upon whom it is conferred whether he lives or dies, and (would pass on) to his successors (as heritage).
[3981]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Jabir through other chains of transmitters, but (with this addition of words) that thehadith transmitted on the authority of Ayyub (these words are found): "The Helpers (Ansar) conferred the benefit of 'Umra, upon the Emigrants (Muhajirin), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Keep your property to yourselves.
[3982]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that a woman gave her garden as a life grant to her son. He died and later on she also died and left a son behind and brothers also, The sons of the woman making life grant said (to those who had been conferred upon this 'Umra): This garden has returned to us. The sons of the one who had been given life grant said: This belonged to our father, during his lifetime and in case of his death. They took their dispute to Tariq, the freed slave of 'Uthman. He called Jabir and he gave testimony of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Life grant belongs to one who is conferred upon this (privilege). Tariq gave this decision and then wrote to Abd al-Malik and informed him, Jabir bearing witness to it. Abd al-Malik said: Jabir has told the truth. Then Tariq gave a decree and, as a result thereof, it is to this day that the garden belongs to descendants of one who was conferred upon the life grant.
[3983]
Sulaiman b. Yasir reported that Jabir gave this verdict. The inheritor has a right (to inherit) the life grant according to the statement of Jabir (b. 'Abdullah) (Allah be pleased with him) which he narrated from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3984]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Life grant is permissible.
[3985]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Life grant is the heritage of one upon whom it is conferred.
[3986]
Abd Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Life grant is permissible. This ha:dith is narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[3987]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is the duty of a Muslim who has something which is to be given as a bequest not to have it for two nights without having his will written down regarding it.
[3988]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters. but with a slight variation of words.
[3989]
A hadith like this have been narrated on the authority of Nifi', who based his narrations of the words of Ibn 'Umar but with a slight variation of words.
[3990]
Salim reported on the authority of his father ('Abdullah b. Umar) that he (his father) had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not proper for a Muslim who has got something to bequeathe to spend even three nights without having his will written down with him regarding it. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: Ever since I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say this I have not spent a night without having my will (written) along with me. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[3991]
Amir b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father (Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas): Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited me in my illness which brought me near death in the year of Hajjat-ul-Wada' (Farewell Pilgrimage). I said: Allah's Messenger, you can well see the pain with which I am afflicted and I am a man possessing wealth, and there is none to inherit me except only one daughter. Should I give two-thirds of my property as Sadaqa ? He said: No. I said: Should I give half (of my property) as Sadaqa? He said: No. He (further) said: Give one-third (in charity) and that is quite enough. To leave your heirs rich is better than to leave them poor, begging from people; that you would never incur an expense seeking therewith the pleasure of Allah, but you would be rewarded therefor, even for a morsel of food that you put in the mouth of your wife. I said: Allah's Messenger. would I survive my companions? He (the Holy Prophet) said: If you survive them, then do such a deed by means of which you seek the pleasure of Allah, but you would increase in your status (in religion) and prestige; you may survive so that people would benefit from you, and others would be harmed by you. (The Holy Prophet) further said: Allah, complete for my Companions their migration, and not cause them to turn back upon their heels. Sa'd b. Khaula is, however, unfortunate. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) felt grief for him as he had died in Mecca.
[3992]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[3993]
'Amir b. Sa'd reported from S'ad (b. Abu Waqqas): Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited me to inquire after my health, the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted on the authority of Zuhri, but lie did not make mention of the words of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in regard to Sa'd b. Khaula except this that he said: "He (the Holy Prophet) did not like death in the land from which lie had migrated."
[3994]
Mus'ab b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father. I was ailing. I sent message to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying: Permit me to give away my property as I like. He refused. I (again) said: (Permit me) to give away half. He (again refused). I (again said): Then one-third. He (the Holy Prophet) observed silence after (I had asked permission to give away) one-third. He (the narrater) said: It was then that endowment of one-third became permissible.
[3995]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Simak with the same chain of transmitters. But he did not mention: "It was then that one-third became permissible."
[3996]
Ibn Sa'd reported his father as saying: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited me during my illness. I said: I am willing away the whole of my property. He said: No. I said: Then half ? He said: No. I said: Should I will away one-third? He said: Yes, and even one-third is enough.
[3997]
Humaid b. 'Abd al-Rahman al-Himyari reported from three of the sons of Sa'd all of whom reported from their father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited Sa'd as he was ill in Mecca. He (Sa'd) wept. He (the Holy Prophet) said : What makes you weep ? He said : I am afraid I may die in the land from where I migrated as Sa'd b. Khaula had died. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said : O Allah, grant health to Sa'd. O Allah, grant health to Sad. He repeated it three times. He (Sa'd) said : Allah's Messenger, I own a large property and I have only one daughter as my inheritor. Should I not will away the whole of my property ? He (the Holy Prophet) said : No. He said: (Should I not will away,) two-thirds of the property ? he (the Holy Prophet) said: No. He (Sa'd) (again) said : (Should I not will away) half (of my property) ? He said : No. He (Sa'd) said: Then one-third ? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said : (Yes), one-third, and one-third is quite substanial. And what you spend as charity from your property is Sadaqa and flour spending on your family is also Sadaqa, and what your wife eats from your property is also Sadaqa, and that you leave your heirs well off (or he said : prospreous) is better than to leave them (poor and) begging from people. He (the Holy Prophet) pointed this with his hands.
[3998]
Humaid b. Abd al-Rahmin al-Himayri reported on the authority of the three of the sons of Sa'd : They said: Sa'd fell ill in Mecca. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited him to inquire after his health. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[3999]
Humaid b. Abd al-Rahman reported this hadith on the authority of three of Sa'd's sons: Sa'd fell ill in Mecca and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited him. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4000]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said: (I wish) if people would reduce from third to fourth (part for making a will of their property), for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: So far as the third (part) is concerned it is quite substantial. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Waki (the words are) "large" or "much".